Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 174.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 174.1. The State Auditor and Inspector is hereby


authorized upon filing of report of audit of the books, records and


accounts of any county officer, board, or commission to publish in a


newspaper or newspapers having a general circulation in the county


or on an Internet website for official publications maintained by


the county a notice of the filing of such audit report; and he or


she may cause to be posted a certificate of completion of such audit


report in the office or offices having custody of the books, records


and accounts embraced in such audit report. In addition to the such


notice published in the newspaper or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county, the report shall be


posted on the county website and the State Auditor and Inspector’s


website. The State Auditor and Inspector shall transmit a copy of


the letter of transmittal of each such audit report to every legal


newspaper published within the county wherein said such audit report


is filed with the county clerk.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 326, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 369, O.S.L. 2025 (19 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 326), is amended to read as follows:


Section 326. A. In addition to the special sessions for


equalizing assessments, and all other special sessions now provided

Req. No. 2334 Page 2


by law, the county commissioners shall meet and hold sessions for


the transaction of business in the county courthouse, at the county


seat, on or before the first Monday of each month, and may remain in


session as long as the public business may require, and the passing


upon, allowing or rejecting of bills against the county shall be


taken up and passed upon by the board in the order in which the


claims have been filed, and in which order such claims must be


entered upon the calendar, except salary, wage and compensation


claims of officers and deputies and employees, which salary, wage


and compensation claims may be considered and paid, on or after the


termination of the service pay period; provided, that such claims by


subordinate deputies and employees be first approved by the officer


having charge of the office or department. The board of county


commissioners may recess or adjourn its meetings within the session,


either from time to time or from day to day, or on call of the


chair; but, if such board does not sooner adjourn its session for


any month, such session shall terminate and be adjourned by


operation of law on the last business day of such month. If the


board shall have adjourned its session before the last business day


of any month, the county clerk shall have power to call special


sessions when the best interests of the county demand it, upon


giving five (5) days’ notice of the time and object of calling the


commissioners together, by posting up notices in three public places


in the county, or by publication in some newspaper of general

Req. No. 2334 Page 3


circulation in the county, or by publication on an Internet website


for official publications maintained by the county; provided, that


in the case of a vacancy in the office of county clerk, the chair of


the board shall have power to call a special session for the purpose


of filling such vacancy.


B. The board of county commissioners may meet at times and in


places within the county other than the county courthouse if it is


determined that such meetings are beneficial to the general public.


Such meetings shall be in compliance with the Oklahoma Open Meeting


Act.


C. County commissioners may attend and participate in


conferences, trainings, and educational, press, and social events,


even if a quorum is present, provided that no official action is


taken and any discussion of the business of the board of county


commissioners is incidental to the event.


D. County commissioners may attend and participate in meetings


and proceedings of the Legislature, even if a quorum is present,


provided that no official action is taken.


E. In a county that has a county budget board as provided in


Section 1407 of this title, county commissioners and other county


elected officers may discuss budgetary matters, provided that a


quorum of the county budget board is not present and no official


action is taken.



Req. No. 2334 Page 4


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 339, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 157, O.S.L. 2025 (19 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 339), is amended to read as follows:


Section 339. A. The board of county commissioners shall have


power:


1. To make all orders respecting the real property of the


county, to sell the public grounds of the county and to purchase


other grounds in lieu thereof; and for the purpose of carrying out


the provisions of this section it shall be sufficient to convey all


the interests of the county in those grounds when an order made for


the sale and a deed is executed in the name of the county by the


chair of the board of county commissioners, reciting the order, and


signed by the chair and acknowledged by the county clerk for and on


behalf of the county;


2. To audit the accounts of all officers having the care,


management, collection, or disbursement of any money belonging to


the county or appropriated for its benefit;


3. To construct and repair bridges and to open, lay out, and


vacate highways; provided, however, that when any state institution,


school, or department shall own, lease, or otherwise control land on


both sides of any established highway, the governing board or body


of the same shall have the power to vacate, alter, or relocate the


highway adjoining the property in the following manner:



Req. No. 2334 Page 5


If it should appear that it would be to the best use and


interest of the institution, school, or department to vacate, alter,


or relocate such highway, the governing board or body shall notify


the board of county commissioners, in writing, of their intention to


hold a public hearing and determine whether to vacate, alter, or


relocate the highway, setting forth the location and terminals of


the road, and all data concerning the proposed right-of-way if


changed or relocated, and shall give fifteen (15) days’ notice of


the hearing by publication in some newspaper in the county or


counties in which the road is located, or by publication on an


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county


or counties in which the road is located, and the hearing shall be


held at the county seat of the county in which the road is located,


and if a county line road, may be heard in either county. At the


hearing testimony may be taken, and any protests or suggestions


shall be received as to the proposed measure, and at the conclusion


thereof if the governing board or body shall find that it would be


to the best use and interest of the institution, school, or


department, and the public generally, they may make an appropriate


order either vacating, altering or relocating the highway, which


order shall be final if approved by the board of county


commissioners. The institution, school, or department may by


agreement share the cost of changing any such road. No property


owner shall be denied access to a public highway by the order;

Req. No. 2334 Page 6


4. To recommend or sponsor an employee or prospective employee


for job-related training and certification in an area that may


require training or certification to comply with state or federal


law as such training or certification is provided by the Department


of Transportation, the Federal Highway Administration, or any other


state agency, technology center school, or university;


5. To determine the years of service required for full-time


county employees to qualify for a continuing education program.


Such programs may consist of courses offered by colleges and


universities that are members of The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education as well as any other in-state or out-of-state programs or


courses which are relevant to the employee’s responsibilities as


approved by the county commissioners. Such programs shall require


that employees maintain at least an A or B average in order to


qualify for one hundred percent (100%) reimbursement. Employees who


maintain passing or satisfactory grades shall qualify for seventy-


five percent (75%) reimbursement under such programs. Such programs


shall require that documentation from colleges and universities


regarding courses completed, credits earned, and tuition charged be


submitted to a board of county commissioners within ninety (90) days


after the completion of courses. General applications and request


forms for such programs shall be submitted to a board of county


commissioners or an appropriate human resources department prior to


the conclusion of a county’s current fiscal year. Employees who

Req. No. 2334 Page 7


elect to participate in such programs shall continue to meet the


full responsibilities of their positions, and participation shall


not interfere with availability for scheduled work or negatively


affect work performance. In order to be eligible for participation


in such programs, employees shall not have been formally disciplined


within one (1) year prior to submitting their program application.


A board of county commissioners shall be authorized to establish a


program requiring a one-year commitment of service to the county


from individuals who participate in such programs. Under such


programs, employees shall only be eligible to receive tuition


reimbursements in exchange for employment with the county lasting at


least one (1) year;


6. Until January 1, 1983, to furnish necessary blank books,


plats, blanks, and stationery for the clerk of the district court,


county clerk, register of deeds, county treasurer, county judge,


sheriff, county surveyor, county attorney, justices of the peace,


and constables, to be paid for out of the county treasury; also a


fireproof vault sufficient in which to keep all the books, records,


vouchers, and papers pertaining to the business of the county;


7. To set off, organize, and change the boundaries of townships


and to designate and give names therefor; provided, that the


boundaries of no township shall be changed within six (6) months


next preceding a general election;



Req. No. 2334 Page 8


8. 7. To lease tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment of the


county to another political subdivision or a state agency. The


Association of County Commissioners of Oklahoma and the Oklahoma


State University Center for Local Government Technology together


shall establish a system of uniform rates for the leasing of such


tools, apparatus, machinery, and equipment;


9. 8. To jointly, with other counties, buy heavy equipment and


to loan or lease such equipment across county lines;


10. 9. To develop personnel policies for the county with the


approval of a majority of all county elected officers, as evidenced


in the minutes of a meeting of the board of county commissioners or


the county budget board;


11. 10. To purchase, rent, or lease-purchase uniforms, safety


devices, and safety equipment for the officers and employees of the


county. The county commissioners may pay for any safety training or


safety devices and safety equipment out of the general county funds


or any county highway funds available to the county commissioners;


12. 11. To provide incentive awards for safety-related job


performance. However, no employee shall be recognized more than


once per calendar year and the award shall not exceed the value of


Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); further, no elected official


shall be eligible to receive a safety award;


13. 12. To provide for payment of notary commissions, filing


fees, and the cost of notary seals and bonds;

Req. No. 2334 Page 9


14. 13. To do and perform other duties and acts that the board


of county commissioners may be required by law to do and perform;


15. 14. To make purchases at a public auction pursuant to the


county purchasing procedures in subsection D of Section 1505 of this


title;


16. 15. To deposit interest income from highway funds in the


general fund of the county;


17. 16. To submit sealed bids for the purchase of equipment


from this state, or any agency or political subdivision of this


state;


18. 17. To utilize county-owned equipment, labor, and supplies


at their disposal on property owned by the county, public schools,


two-year colleges, or technical branches of colleges that are


members of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, the state


and municipalities according to the provisions of Section 36-113 of


Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Cooperative agreements may be


general in terms of routine maintenance or specific in terms of


construction and agreed to and renewed on an annual basis. Work


performed pursuant to Section 36-113 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma


Statutes shall comply with the provisions of this section;


19. 18. To enter into intergovernmental cooperative agreements


with the federally recognized Indian tribes within this state to


address issues of construction and maintenance of streets, roads,



Req. No. 2334 Page 10


bridges, and highways exclusive of the provisions of Section 1221 of


Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


20. 19. To execute hold harmless agreements with the lessor in


the manner provided by subsection B of Section 636.5 of Title 69 of


the Oklahoma Statutes when leasing or lease-purchasing equipment;


21. 20. To accept donations of rights-of-way or right-of-way


easements pursuant to Section 381 et seq. of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


22. 21. To establish by resolution the use of per diem for


specific purposes in accordance with the limitations provided by


Sections 500.8 and 500.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


23. 22. To apply to the Department of Environmental Quality for


a waste tire permit to bale waste tires for use in approved


engineering projects;


24. 23. To enter into the National Association of Counties


(NACo) Live Healthy Prescription, Health and Dental Discount


Program;


25. 24. To work with federal, state, municipal, and public


school district properties in an effort to minimize cost to such


entities;


26. 25. To work with ambulance service districts established


under Section 9C of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution in an


effort to minimize cost to such entities;



Req. No. 2334 Page 11


27. 26. To provide incentive awards to employees for


participating in voluntary wellness programs which result in


improved health. Incentive awards may be created by the Wellness


Council set forth in Section 1302 of this title;


28. 27. To establish a county employee benefit program to


encourage outstanding performance in the workplace. Monies may be


expended for the purchase of recognition awards for presentation to


an employee or members of a work unit. Recognition awards may be


presented at a formal or informal ceremony, banquet, reception, or


luncheon, the cost of which may be expended from monies available in


the county department’s or division’s operating fund;


29. 28. To trade in equipment to a vendor or on statewide


contract by acquiring used equipment values pursuant to subsection B


of Section 421.1 of this title;


30. 29. To expend federal funds made available to a county of


the state through the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic


Security Act (CARES Act), Pub. L. 116–136, or similar relief funds


according to the permissible uses of the applicable federal


legislation or guidance issued by any federal agency thereof,


regardless of any lack of specific state statutory authorization to


perform the duties or functions for which the federal government has


provided the funds. The expenditure of the funds in accordance with


the federal legislation or guidance issued by any federal agency



Req. No. 2334 Page 12


thereof shall be at the discretion of the board of county


commissioners.


The receipt of funding through the CARES Act or similar relief


funds shall not be considered a supplemental appropriation and shall


be exempt from the requirements of Section 1420 of this title. In


the event the period allotted for expenditure of federal funds


crosses fiscal years, such funds shall not be considered revenue


when setting the county’s budget for the next fiscal year; and


31. 30. To enter into intergovernmental cooperative agreements


which shall include shared services, with local governmental units


within this state pursuant to the provisions of the Interlocal


Cooperation Act, Section 1002 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.; and


31. To choose to create, operate, and maintain an Internet


website for official publications. Such website shall allow for


residents of the county and other interested parties to be notified


by electronic communication when new public notices are published on


the website. A link to access the website shall be publicly


displayed in every building owned by the county.


B. The county commissioners of a county or, in counties where


there is a county budget board, the county budget board may


designate money from general county funds for the designated purpose


of drug enforcement and drug abuse prevention programs within the


county.

Req. No. 2334 Page 13


C. When any lease or lease purchase is made on behalf of the


county by the board pursuant to the provisions of this section, the


county shall be allowed to have trade in values for transactions


involving the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act.


D. In order to timely comply with the Oklahoma Vehicle License


and Registration Act with regard to county vehicles, the board of


county commissioners may, by resolution, create a petty cash


account. The board of county commissioners may request a purchase


order for petty cash in an amount necessary to pay the expense of


license and registration fees for county motor vehicles. Any


balance in the petty cash account after the license and registration


fees have been paid shall be returned to the account or fund from


which the funds originated. The county purchasing agent shall be


the custodian of the petty cash account, and the petty cash account


shall be subject to audit.


E. When the board of county commissioners approves an express


trust, pursuant to Sections 176 through 180.4 of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, for the purpose of operating a county jail, the


trustees of the public trust may appoint commissioned peace


officers, certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and


Training, to provide security for inmates that are required to be


transported outside of the detention facility, and investigate


violations of law within the detention facility. Other personnel



Req. No. 2334 Page 14


necessary to operate the jail may be employed and trained or


certified as may be required by applicable state or federal law.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 339.6, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 339.6. A. The board of county commissioners of any


county of this state having a population of more than five hundred


thousand (500,000) persons according to the last federal decennial


census, by resolution, may, by resolution, determine a curfew for


juveniles that will apply to all unincorporated areas of the county.


The parameters of the curfew shall be determined by the board and


all penalty provisions shall comply with the provisions of Title 10A


of the Oklahoma Statutes and federal law concerning detention and


custody of juveniles.


B. The board shall provide public notice of the curfew in a


newspaper of general circulation in the county or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county. The


notice shall be published once weekly for a period of four (4)


continuous weeks.


C. The county shall correspond and work in conjunction with any


appropriate state agency, if assistance is required in producing


signs and posting the curfew.


D. The county shall post curfew information, as determined


pursuant to subsections A through C of this section, on the county


line marker where any state highway enters a county and at all off-

Req. No. 2334 Page 15


ramps where interstate highways or turnpikes enter a county, unless


a state agency has such jurisdiction to properly post signs. The


appropriate board of county commissioners shall reimburse any state


agency that may assist for the full cost of the required signage.


E. Any person convicted of a curfew violation pursuant to this


section shall be fined an amount not exceeding Twenty-five Dollars


($25.00). Any person convicted of a second or subsequent curfew


violation shall be fined an amount not exceeding One Hundred Dollars


($100.00), or assigned not more than thirty (30) hours of community


service, or both such fine and community service hours.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 343, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 343. Upon the return of the appraisement, as provided


in Section 342 of this title, the board of county commissioners


shall give notice by publication in a newspaper of general paid


circulation in the county, for two (2) successive weekly issues or


by weekly publication on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county for two (2) consecutive weeks,


that said such real estate is about to be sold.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 345, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 345. They shall superintend the fiscal concerns of the


county and secure their management in the best manner; they shall


keep an account of the receipts and expenditures of the county, and

Req. No. 2334 Page 16


on the first Monday of July annually, they shall cause a full and


accurate statement of the assessments, receipts and expenditures of


the preceding year, to be made out in detail under separate heads,


with an account of all the debts payable to and by the county


treasurer, and they shall have the same printed in at least one


newspaper in their county or published on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by their county, and if there be no


paper or Internet website in the county the same shall be posted up


at the usual place of holding their sessions, and at a public place


in each precinct in the county.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 351, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 212, O.S.L. 2022 (19 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 351), is amended to read as follows:


Section 351. A. The board of county commissioners of each


county of this state is hereby authorized to provide firefighting


service in the county and for such purpose to use county funds to


rent, lease, or purchase firefighting equipment and to rent or


construct and equip and operate fire stations and to employ


necessary personnel to provide such service. The board of county


commissioners shall also have the authority to determine and collect


charges for firefighting services performed by the county from any


person to whom such services are provided.


B. The board of county commissioners of each county of this


state shall have the power to take by grant, purchase, gift, devise,

Req. No. 2334 Page 17


or lease, and to dispose of, any real property for the purpose of


acquiring right-of-ways and easements necessary in providing


firefighting services to the county, including the construction and


maintenance of roads and the installation of dry hydrants. The


board may use county funds and equipment to construct and maintain


such roads and to install such dry hydrants. Provided, nothing in


this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the installation of


dry hydrants on privately owned property by the owner thereof at the


expense of the owner.


C. The board of county commissioners of each county of this


state shall have the authority to use county personnel operating


county equipment to fight fires in situations where an emergency is


determined to exist, provided the firefighting service is requested


by the county civil defense director or upon a request of a rural


fire department.


D. 1. A corporate fire department organized pursuant to the


provisions of Section 592 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes or a


county fire department organized pursuant to the provisions of


subsection A of this section may petition the board of county


commissioners of the county in which the fire department provides


protection to convert to a county fire department organized pursuant


to the provisions of this subsection. The petition shall set forth


and particularly describe the proposed boundaries of such county


fire department and shall be accompanied by a map of such proposed

Req. No. 2334 Page 18


fire department, drawn to a scale of not less than one (1) inch to a


mile. The petition shall also set forth the administration,


control, and ownership of all the corporate fire department’s assets


in the event such petition is approved. Such petition shall be


filed with the county clerk of such county who shall present it to


the board of county commissioners at their next regular or special


meeting. Upon presentation of such petition, the board of county


commissioners shall set the same for hearing at a time not less than


twenty (20) days nor more than forty (40) days from the date of


presentation and shall direct the county clerk to give notice of


such hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in


the county or an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county in which the proposed county fire


department is located. Such notice shall describe the boundaries of


the proposed county fire department, shall state the time and place


of the hearing, and shall state that any person may appear and


protest the organization of the county fire department or the


proposed boundaries thereof. The board of county commissioners


shall hold the hearing described in said such notice, and it shall


have jurisdiction to hear and determine all protests to the creation


of such county fire department and all matters pertaining to the


same. It may amend the plan of such proposed county fire department


by excluding from within its boundaries any lands which it may deem


will not be benefited by the formation of such county fire

Req. No. 2334 Page 19


department, or by including other lands as a part thereof upon


application of the owners of such land; provided, however, it shall


not exclude from such district any unincorporated lands which are


completely surrounded by lands which are included in the proposed


county fire department. If the board of county commissioners


determines that the conversion of such corporate fire department to


a county fire department will be conducive to the public safety of


the affected area therein, then said the board shall give such


proposed county fire department a name and shall authorize and


approve the organization of said a county fire department.


2. To be eligible to convert to a county fire department formed


pursuant to this subsection, a fire department shall have a Public


Protection Classification of nine (9) or better from ISO Commercial


Risk Services, Inc., limit the size of such volunteer county fire


department to not less than six or more than twenty members per fire


station, and shall be subject to the laws of the State of Oklahoma


this state regarding the administration and operation of a fire


department, including, but not limited to, the laws of the State


Department of Labor and the State Fire Marshal Commission. For


purposes of this subsection, a volunteer fire department is one


which has in its employ not more than two full-time salaried


firefighters.


3. Directors of a county fire department organized pursuant to


this subsection shall be residents of said such district. At the

Req. No. 2334 Page 20


time of making its order organizing such county fire department, the


board of county commissioners shall appoint five directors, one of


which shall hold his or her respective office for a term of five (5)


years, one of which shall hold his or her respective office for a


term of four (4) years, one of which shall hold his or her


respective office for a term of three (3) years, one of which shall


hold his or her respective office for a term of two (2) years, and


one of which shall hold his or her respective office for a term of


one (1) year. On or before January 1, 2002, the board of county


commissioners shall, for fire departments which operate more than


five fire stations, appoint additional directors of a county fire


department until the number of directors equals the number of fire


stations operated by that county fire department. Each additional


director shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners for


a term that matches the term of one of the first five directors


appointed. Whenever a new fire station is added to a county fire


department which has five or more fire stations, the board of county


commissioners shall appoint an additional director from that


district in which the new fire station has been added. Each year


thereafter, there shall be appointed by the board of county


commissioners for a term of five (5) years so many members as are


necessary to replace all members whose terms are expiring on the


board of directors for such county fire department.



Req. No. 2334 Page 21


4. The board of directors of a county fire department organized


pursuant to this subsection shall select one of its members to serve


as chair and shall appoint a clerk and a treasurer. The board of


directors shall fix the term and duties of the chair, clerk, and


treasurer. The chair and members of the board of directors shall


serve without compensation. The treasurer shall give an official


bond, in an amount fixed and with sureties approved by the board of


county commissioners, conditioned upon the faithful accounting for


all money pertaining to the county fire department and coming into


his or her hands.


5. The board of directors of a county fire department organized


pursuant to this subsection shall have the following powers and


duties:


a. to manage and conduct the business affairs of such


county fire department,


b. to make and execute all necessary contracts,


c. to purchase or lease-purchase and maintain all


necessary and convenient engines, hoses, hose carts,


or other appliances and supplies for the full


equipment of a fire company or department from


available funds,


d. to appoint the fire chief, fire company officers and


employees (whether paid or volunteer), sufficient to



Req. No. 2334 Page 22


maintain and operate the equipment owned by the county


fire department,


e. to take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease,


and to dispose of real or personal property of every


kind necessary for the operation of the county fire


department,


f. to construct or otherwise acquire from available funds


suitable firehouses and other buildings or structures


suitable for the housing of equipment and supplies of


the county fire department, or for carrying on its own


business and affairs,


g. to employ such officers and employees as may be


required from available funds, fix their compensation


and prescribe their duties,


h. to establish rules for such county fire department and


for the prevention of fires and conflagrations within


the department’s boundaries and for the protection of


property at and during any fire,


i. to do any and all other things necessary and proper in


the management and operation of the county fire


department for the purpose of protecting property


within its boundaries from fire, and


j. to prepare an annual budget and follow existing laws


pertaining to the budget process such as public

Req. No. 2334 Page 23


notice, public hearings, protest periods, and filing


requirements in the same manner as they apply to other


forms of government in Oklahoma.


6. The board of directors of a county fire department organized


pursuant to this subsection may submit an application to include the


firefighters of such county fire department in the Oklahoma


Firefighters Pension and Retirement System. The application for


participation in the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement


System shall be submitted in accordance with subsection A of Section


49-105.2 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes. For purposes of


complying with Sections 49-103 and 49-104 of Title 11 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, the chair, clerk, and treasurer of the board of


directors of the county fire department shall serve on the local


firefighters pension and retirement board along with three


firefighters of such county fire department elected by the members


of the county fire department. The chair of the board of directors


of the county fire department shall be the chair of the local board


of the county fire department and the clerk of the board of


directors of the county fire department shall be the secretary of


the local board of the county fire department. The chair of the


local board of the county fire department shall have a casting vote


with the members of the local board of the county fire department


only when necessary to avoid a tie vote. The local board of the


county fire department shall promulgate such rules as may be

Req. No. 2334 Page 24


necessary to ensure the orderly conduct of a local board meeting.


While participating in the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and


Retirement System, the board of directors, local board, and fire


chief of the county fire department shall perform all administrative


requirements of the pension system.


7. Any board of directors of a county fire department organized


pursuant to this subsection having volunteers enrolled as members of


such county fire department shall adopt a code of minimum rules and


regulations in substantial compliance with the following:


a. Fire chief.


(1) The fire chief shall be at the head of the


department, subject to the laws of the State of


Oklahoma this state, rules of the board of


directors, and the rules and regulations herein


adopted.


(2) The fire chief shall be held responsible for the


general condition and efficient operation of the


department, the training of members, and the


performance of all other duties imposed upon him


or her by law or the board of directors.


(3) The fire chief may inspect or cause to be


inspected by members of the department, the fire


hydrants, cisterns, and other sources of water


supply at least twice a year.

Req. No. 2334 Page 25


(4) The fire chief shall maintain a library or file


of publications on fire prevention and fire


protection and shall make use of the library or


file to the best advantage of all members.


(5) The fire chief shall make every effort to attend


all fires and direct the officers and members of


the fire department in the performance of their


duties.


(6) The fire chief shall see that the citizens are


kept informed on fire hazards within the


boundaries of the department and on the


activities of the department.


(7) The fire chief shall see that each fire is


carefully investigated to determine its cause,


and in the case of suspicion of incendiarism


shall notify proper authorities. The fire chief


shall secure and preserve all possible evidence


for future use in the case of a suspicious


incendiarism.


(8) The fire chief shall file the appropriate


activity report forms with the Office of the


State Fire Marshal in Oklahoma City on an annual


basis. The activity report forms shall be


designed by the State Fire Marshal and shall

Req. No. 2334 Page 26


include, but not be limited to, the amount of


property and vehicle fire loss, types of fires,


inspections, and investigations. The report


shall include notification of all fire-related


civilian deaths and injuries in the respective


jurisdiction and of firefighter deaths in the


line of duty and of firefighter injuries in the


line of duty requiring the services of a hospital


or physician or both.


b. Assistant fire chief.


In the absence of the fire chief, the assistant fire


chief on duty shall command the department and be held


responsible therefore in all respects with the full


powers and responsibilities of the fire chief.


c. Company officers.


The company officers shall be selected upon their


ability to meet the following requirements:


(1) their knowledge of firefighting,


(2) their leadership ability, and


(3) their knowledge of firefighting equipment.


d. Secretary-treasurer.


One member elected by the fire department shall be


secretary-treasurer. His or her duties shall consist


of the following:

Req. No. 2334 Page 27


(1) calling the roll at the opening of each meeting,


(2) keeping the minutes of each meeting, and


(3) collecting any money due the department by the


members.


e. New members.


(1) An applicant of a participating county fire


department of the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension


and Retirement System shall meet the membership


requirements of the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension


and Retirement System before he or she may be


appointed as a new member of the county fire


department.


(2) A new member shall be on probation for one (1)


year after his or her appointment.


(3) A new member of a participating county fire


department of the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension


and Retirement System shall be immediately


enrolled as a member of the Oklahoma Firefighters


Pension and Retirement System regardless of


whether such member has completed his or her


probation period.


(4) The majority of the fire department members must


approve new volunteer members upon completion of


their probation period.

Req. No. 2334 Page 28


f. Bylaws.


The bylaws of the department shall include:


(1) All volunteer firefighters are required, when


notified, to respond to fire alarms and other


emergencies.


(2) A volunteer firefighter is required to be present


at all regular meetings, call meetings and


schools presented for the benefit of the


firefighters.


(3) There shall be at least one regular business


meeting each month.


(4) Any volunteer firefighter having two unexcused


absences in succession or three unexcused


absences in a period of three (3) months will be


dropped from the fire department rolls.


(5) Volunteer firefighters leaving the boundaries of


the department for an extended period of time


will be required to notify the fire chief.


(6) Any volunteer firefighter refusing to attend


training classes provided for him or her will be


dropped from the fire department rolls.


(7) Any volunteer member of the fire department shall


be dropped from the fire department rolls for the


following offenses:

Req. No. 2334 Page 29


(a) conduct unbecoming a firefighter,


(b) any act of insubordination,


(c) neglect of duty,


(d) any violation of rules and regulations


governing the fire department, or


(e) conviction of a felony.


8. a. A county fire department organized pursuant to the


provisions of this subsection shall maintain,


according to its own accounting needs, some or all of


the funds and account groups in its system of accounts


that are consistent with legal and operating


requirements and as prescribed by the State Auditor


and Inspector. The required funds may include, but


not be limited to:


(1) a general fund, to account for all monies


received and disbursed for general department


purposes, including all assets, liabilities,


reserves, fund balances, revenues, and


expenditures which are not accounted for in any


other fund or special ledger account,


(2) special revenue funds, as required, to account


for the proceeds of specific revenue sources that


are restricted by law to expenditures for


specific purposes,

Req. No. 2334 Page 30


(3) a capital improvement fund, to account for


financial resources segregated for acquisition,


construction or other improvement related to


capital facilities, and


(4) a ledger or group of accounts in which to record


the details relating to the general fixed assets


of the county or department.


b. Funds raised by a nonprofit organization for the


purpose of supporting the fire protection services of


a county fire department organized pursuant to the


provisions of this subsection, whether such funds were


raised before or after a corporate fire department


converts to a county fire department, shall not be


commingled with public funds and shall be used only


for designated benevolent or charitable purposes,


including, but not limited to, fire protection


purposes.


c. No expenditure may be authorized or made by any


employee or member of the board of directors of a


county fire department organized pursuant to the


provisions of this subsection which exceeds any fund


balance of any fund of the budget as adopted or


amended or which exceeds the appropriation for any


fund of the budget as adopted or amended. Any balance

Req. No. 2334 Page 31


remaining in a fund at the end of the budget year


shall be carried forward to the credit of the fund for


the next budget year. It shall be unlawful for any


employee or member of the board of directors of a


county fire department organized pursuant to the


provisions of this subsection in any budget year to


create or authorize creation of a deficit in any fund.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 360, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 360. A. As used in this section:


1. “Dilapidated building” means a structure which, through


neglect or injury, lacks necessary repairs or otherwise is in a


state of decay or partial ruin to such an extent that such structure


is a hazard to the health, safety, or welfare of the general public;


and


2. “Owner” means the owner of record as shown by the most


current tax rolls of the county treasurer.


B. The board of county commissioners of any county in this


state with a population in excess of five hundred fifty thousand


(550,000) may cause dilapidated buildings within the unincorporated


area of the county to be torn down and removed in accordance with


the provisions in this section. following procedure:


1. At least ten (10) days’ notice that a building is to be torn


down or removed shall be given to the owner of the property before

Req. No. 2334 Page 32


the board of county commissioners holds a hearing. A copy of the


notice shall be posted on the property to be affected. In addition,


a copy of said such notice shall be sent by mail to the property


owner at the address shown by the current year’s tax rolls in the


office of the county treasurer. Written notice shall also be mailed


to any mortgage holder as shown by the records in the office of the


county clerk to the last-known address of the mortgagee. At the


time of mailing of notice to any property owner or mortgage holder,


the county shall obtain a receipt of mailing from the postal


service, which receipt shall indicate the date of mailing and the


name and address of the mailee. However, if neither the property


owner nor mortgage holder can be located, notice shall be given by


posting a copy of the notice on the property, and by publication in


a newspaper having a general circulation in the county or by


publication on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county. Such notice shall be published once not


less than ten (10) days prior to any hearing or action by the board


of county commissioners pursuant to the provisions of this section.;


2. A hearing shall be held by the board of county commissioners


to determine if the property is dilapidated and has become


detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of the general public


and the community, or if said such property creates a fire hazard


which is dangerous to other property.;



Req. No. 2334 Page 33


3. Pursuant to a finding that the condition of the property


constitutes a detriment or a hazard and that the property would be


benefited by the removal of such conditions, the board of county


commissioners may cause the dilapidated building to be torn down and


removed. The board of county commissioners shall fix reasonable


dates for the commencement and completion of the work. The board of


county commissioners shall immediately file a notice of dilapidation


and lien with the county clerk describing the findings of the board


at the hearing, and stating that the county claims a lien on said


such property for the destruction and removal costs and that such


costs are the personal obligation of the property owner from and


after the date of filing of said such notice. The agents of the


county are granted the right of entry on the property for the


performance of the necessary duties as a governmental function of


the county if the work is not performed by the property owner within


dates fixed by the board.;


4. The board of county commissioners shall determine the actual


cost of the dismantling and removal of dilapidated buildings and any


other expenses that may be necessary in conjunction with the


dismantling and removal of the buildings including the cost of


notice and mailing. The county clerk shall forward a statement of


the actual cost attributable to the dismantling and removal of the


buildings and a demand for payment of such costs, by mail to the


property owner. In addition, a copy of said such statement shall be

Req. No. 2334 Page 34


mailed to any mortgage holder at the address provided for in


paragraph 1 of this section. At the time of mailing of the


statement of costs to any property owner or mortgage holder, the


county shall obtain a receipt of mailing from the postal service,


which receipt shall indicate the date of mailing and the name and


address of the mailee. If a county dismantles or removes any


dilapidated buildings, the costs to the property owner shall not


exceed the actual cost of the labor, maintenance, equipment, and any


other expenses required for the dismantling and removal of the


dilapidated buildings. If dismantling and removal of the


dilapidated buildings is done on a private contract basis, the


contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder. All costs


and expenses may be paid from the general fund of the county.;


5. When payment is made to the county for costs incurred, the


board of county commissioners shall file a release of lien, but if


payment attributable to the actual cost of the dismantling and


removal of the buildings is not made within six (6) months from the


date of the mailing of the statement to the owner of such property,


the board shall forward a certified statement of the amount of the


cost to the county treasurer of said such county. Said Such costs


shall be levied on the property and collected by the county


treasurer as are other taxes authorized by law. Until finally paid,


the costs and the interest thereon shall be the personal obligation


of the property owner from and after the date of the notice of

Req. No. 2334 Page 35


dilapidation and lien is filed with the county clerk. In addition


the cost and the interest thereon shall be a lien against the


property from the date the notice of the lien is filed with the


county clerk. Said Such lien shall be coequal with the lien of ad


valorem taxes and all other taxes and special assessments and shall


be prior and superior to all other titles and liens against the


property. The lien shall continue until the cost is fully paid. At


the time of collection, the county treasurer shall collect a fee of


Five Dollars ($5.00) for each parcel of property. Said Such fee


shall be deposited to the credit of the general fund of the county.


At any time prior to collection as provided for in this paragraph,


the county may pursue any civil remedy for collection of the amount


owing, interest and costs thereon including an action in personam


against the property owner and an action in rem to foreclose its


lien against the property. A mineral interest, if severed from the


surface interest and not owned by the surface owner, shall not be


subject to any tax or judgment lien created pursuant to this


section. Upon receiving payment, by civil remedy the board of


county commissioners shall forward to the county treasurer a notice


of such payment and shall direct discharge of the lien.; and


6. The board of county commissioners may designate, by


resolution, an administrative officer or administrative body to


carry out the duties of the board of county commissioners specified


in this section. The property owner shall have the right of appeal

Req. No. 2334 Page 36


to the board from any order of the administrative officer or


administrative body. Such appeal shall be taken by filing written


notice of appeal with the county clerk within ten (10) days after


the administrative order is rendered.


7. For the purposes of this section, “dilapidated building”


means a structure which through neglect or injury lacks necessary


repairs or otherwise is in a state of decay or partial ruin to such


an extent that said structure is a hazard to the health, safety, or


welfare of the general public. “Owner” means the owner of record as


shown by the most current tax rolls of the county treasurer.


8. C. 1. Nothing in the provisions of this section shall


prevent the county from abating a dilapidated building as a nuisance


or otherwise exercising its duties to protect the health, safety, or


welfare of the general public.


9. 2. The officers, employees or agents of the county shall not


be liable for any damages of loss of property due to the removal of


dilapidated buildings performed pursuant to the provisions of this


section or as otherwise prescribed by law.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 383, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 383. The mode of submitting questions to the people


contemplated by the last two sections shall be the following: The


whole question, including the sum desired to be raised, the amount


of tax desired to be authorized, the rate per annum, and the whole

Req. No. 2334 Page 37


regulation, including the time of its taking effect or having


operation, if it be of a nature which can be set forth, and the


penalty of its violation if there be one, is to be published at


least four (4) weeks in some newspaper published in the county or on


an Internet website for official publications maintained by the


county for four (4) consecutive weeks. If there be no such


newspaper or website, the publication is to be made by posting up in


at least one of the most public places in each election precinct in


the county; and in all cases the notices shall name the time when


such question will be voted upon, and the form in which the question


shall be taken, and a copy of the question submitted shall be posted


up at each place of voting during the day of election.


SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 421.1, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 337, O.S.L. 2023 (19 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 421.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 421.1. A. The board of county commissioners is hereby


authorized to use any tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment


belonging to the county, the original cost of which exceeded One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), as a trade-in on a cash purchase or


lease purchase of any other tools, apparatus, machinery, or


equipment.


B. To establish an appraised value for an item to be sold at


public auction or traded in, the purchasing agent may refer to an


industry-recognized appraisal manual for used construction equipment

Req. No. 2334 Page 38


to estimate the value of the item being sold, or obtain appraisal


quotes from at least two vendors in the business of selling items


like the one being sold.


C. Except when such items are disposed of pursuant to


subsection E, F, or I of this section, the following procedures


shall be used for the sale, by the board of county commissioners, of


any tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment, the original cost of


which exceeded One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or any information


technology hardware or software having an original cost of Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, belonging to the county:


1. The board of county commissioners shall give notice of such


sale by publication for two successive weekly issues in a newspaper


of general paid circulation in the county for two successive weekly


issues or by weekly publication for two (2) consecutive weeks on an


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county;


2. Bids for such tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment on


sale shall be in writing, sealed, and delivered to the county clerk


of such county;


3. At the next regular meeting of the board of county


commissioners after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the


date of first publication of notice of the sale, the board of county


commissioners shall open such bids and award such tools, apparatus,


machinery, or equipment to the highest and best bidder with the


option of rejecting all bids; and

Req. No. 2334 Page 39


4. The board of county commissioners may hold a public auction


or use an Internet auction, which may include online bidding, in


lieu of advertising for sealed bids as provided above. Such auction


shall be advertised as provided herein.


D. A board of county commissioners may sell any materials,


tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment to a tribal governmental


entity or state agency, if the agency is subject to the Oklahoma


Central Purchasing Act. The board of county commissioners may


purchase materials, tools, apparatus, machinery, or equipment from a


state agency, if the agency is subject to the Oklahoma Central


Purchasing Act.


E. The board of county commissioners may, by resolution, enter


into an agreement with any tribal governmental entity or other


county or political subdivision for the purpose of selling,


transferring, trading, or otherwise disposing of equipment or


materials at a price agreed upon by both governing bodies.


Transactions made pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject


to the requirements in subsection C of this section.


F. Advertisement of surplus property consigned to sell at a


Circuit Engineering District auction shall be provided by the


auction company under contract to conduct the sale. Advertising


shall be provided to attract the most potential buyers. Advertising


media may include, but not be limited to, sale flyers, newspapers,


radio, television, and Internet postings.

Req. No. 2334 Page 40


G. Pursuant to the authority of Section 1 of this title, boards


of county commissioners shall have authority, under such statute and


in consideration of the procedures in this section to sell real


property belonging to the county without declaring such property


surplus under the following conditions:


1. A certified appraisal of the county property shall be


performed to determine the market value of the property and accepted


by the board of county commissioners;


2. After acceptance of the certified appraisal, the board of


county commissioners shall, pursuant to the requirements of this


section, give notice of such sale by publication for two successive


weekly issues in a newspaper of general paid circulation in the


county for two successive weekly issues or by weekly publication for


two (2) consecutive weeks on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county;


3. Bids for the real property shall be in writing, sealed and


delivered to the county clerk of such county;


4. At the next regular meeting of the board of county


commissioners after the expiration of fifteen (15) days from the


date of first publication of notice of sale, the board of county


commissioners shall open such bids;


5. A successful bid must be no less than the market value of


the real property to be considered by the board of county



Req. No. 2334 Page 41


commissioners for acceptance. The board of county commissioners


reserves the right to reject any and all bids;


6. If more than one bid is above the market value of the real


property, the board of county commissioners shall have the right to


compel the potential buyers of the real property who have bid above


the market amount to enter into public auction conducted by the


chairman of the board of county commissioners after the opening of


such bids, to establish the highest bid for the property in order to


assure that the county is receiving adequate consideration for the


property;


7. A majority vote of the board of county commissioners shall


be required to determine the successful bidder of the real property.


Upon awarding the bid, either through sealed bid or by conducting a


public auction of those bidders who bid more than the market value


of the real property, the board of county commissioners shall have


the right to pledge the occupied property, using an irrevocable bond


or letter of credit, as provided for in paragraph 10 of this


subsection, as collateral in order to finance bonds to purchase


other real property or build a replacement building, or both;


8. If the sale price is less than the estimated cost of new


land purchase or construction, then said such sales contract shall


be contingent upon the public approval of bond funding or other


authorized funding to allow the complete payment of the contemplated


project;

Req. No. 2334 Page 42


9. The board of county commissioners shall have authority


pursuant to paragraphs 5 and 6 of Section 1 of this title to make


any order concerning the sale of such property contingent upon a


closing date in the future in order to continue to use said such


real property until a replacement building is completed. Upon


completion of the replacement building, the board of county


commissioners shall execute all documents and title transfers


pertaining to said such real property to the successful bidder;


10. The successful bidder shall execute an irrevocable bond or


letter of credit with a surety company or bank licensed to do


business in the State of Oklahoma this state and organized under the


corporate laws of the State of Oklahoma this state and registered


with the Secretary of State of Oklahoma equal to the amount of the


purchase price of the real property within fifteen (15) days of


awarding of the bid. Failure to provide either an irrevocable bond


or letter of credit in favor of the board of county commissioners


within said such time limitation shall act as a rejection and


cancellation by the board of the award of bid and said the board


may, at that point, enter into a contract with any secondary or


subsequent bidder that meets the aforementioned such qualifications


without further notice; and


11. If there are no bids submitted or all submitted bids are


less than the market value of the real property after the expiration


of fifteen (15) days from the date of first publication of notice of

Req. No. 2334 Page 43


sale, the board of county commissioners shall publish the notice of


sale and accept bids for a second time complying with the


requirements of paragraphs 2 through 4 of this subsection. If there


are no bids submitted or all submitted bids are less than the market


value of the real property after the expiration of fifteen (15) days


from the date of second publication of notice of sale, the board of


county commissioners shall have the right to sell real property,


upon majority vote, without any bidding procedure or auction,


directly to any person or entity for an amount that is not less than


the highest bid previously submitted through any previous bidding


procedures provided in this subsection.


H. The board of county commissioners may solicit telephone bids


for the removal of recyclable materials.


I. The board of county commissioners shall have the authority


to trade in equipment to a vendor or on statewide contract by


acquiring used equipment values pursuant to subsection B of this


section.


SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 444, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 444. It shall be the mandatory duty of the board of


county commissioners to cause to be published in a newspaper


published in the county or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county, a full and complete report of


all its official proceedings at each regular and special meeting,

Req. No. 2334 Page 44


except blanket purchase orders, within the time provided for in


Sections 445 and 446 of this title, and the board of county


commissioners shall pay for the same publication in a newspaper from


the appropriation as provided in this section. The board of county


commissioners may also order the publication of a copy of the


official proceedings in a newspaper printed in any language other


than the English Language language whenever it shall deem it


necessary for the better information of the inhabitants. The board


of county commissioners may omit the listing of all employees and


their salaries approved for payment in the monthly publication of


proceedings. However, it shall be the mandatory duty of the board


of county commissioners to cause to be published a full and complete


report of all the county employees and their salaries paid annually.


An asterisk shall be placed in front of the names of employees paid


for less than the full twelve (12) months of the preceding calendar


year. The listing shall reflect the gross salary of every employee


reported to the Internal Revenue Service on the W-2 Form of the


employee. Such annual publication of the employees and their


salaries shall be published annually in the month of February for


the preceding calendar year in a newspaper of the county which meets


the requirements set forth in Section 106 of Title 25 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county.



Req. No. 2334 Page 45


It shall also be the mandatory duty of the board of county


commissioners and the county excise board, each fiscal year, to take


such steps as may be necessary and proper under the statutes


relating to estimates of needs and appropriations, to appropriate,


in the General Government account within the general fund of the


county, an amount sufficient to pay for the publication of all such


proceedings during the fiscal year, at the legal rate therefor, but


in no event less than the total of legal claims for publication of


such proceedings during the immediately preceding fiscal year.


SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 445, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 445. It shall be the duty of the county clerk to make


out a complete report of the proceedings of each regular and special


meeting of the board. Included in such report shall be the purpose


of any warrant that is approved for payment at such meeting. The


county clerk shall transmit the report to the publishers of the


newspaper selected by the board to publish such proceedings or


publish such report on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county. The report shall be made out and


transmitted or published by the clerk upon the approval of the board


of county commissioners at its next regularly scheduled meeting, or


no later than ten (10) days from the time the proceedings were had.


SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 731, is


amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 2334 Page 46


Section 731. A. The board of county commissioners is


authorized to provide for the construction or repairing of


courthouses, jails, or other necessary buildings, and make contracts


on behalf of the county for building or repairing the same such, and


for the purpose of providing a fund for the payment of the cost of


the same such, the board of county commissioners is hereby


authorized and empowered to provide for the levy of a tax and to


continue such provision from year to year for a period not exceeding


five (5) years: Provided, that such. The levy for such purpose,


together with the levies for all other purposes, shall not exceed


the amount authorized by law: Provided, further, that the. The


money, raised by such levy, shall constitute a separate and distinct


fund from all others in the hands of the county treasurer until the


obligation assumed by the board of county commissioners under


authority of this section shall have been discharged.


And provided, further, that no B. 1. No levy of taxes for the


purposes of this section shall be made until after a majority of the


legally qualified voters of said the county, voting upon said such


proposition, shall have voted in favor of the expenditures whose


payment is to be provided for by said such levy or levies of taxes,


at a general election at which said such proposition shall be


submitted, or at a special election called for the purpose of voting


upon said such proposition.



Req. No. 2334 Page 47


2. The proposition submitted at such general or special


election shall be whether or not the board of county commissioners


shall be authorized to expend the sum desired (stating such sum) for


the building of a courthouse, jail, or other necessary building,


stating such sum, and shall be arranged on the ballot in suitable


and convenient form for voting. Such special election shall be held


as nearly as possible in conformity to the general election laws of


the state; and at any such general or special election the votes


upon the proposition submitted shall be counted and canvassed, the


returns thereof made, and the results declared as nearly in


conformity to the general election laws of the state as possible:.


Provided, that notice 3. Notice of the submitting of such


proposition to the voters of the county shall be given by the county


clerk by publication in at least two newspapers of general


circulation published in said such county and having a general


circulation therein, or published on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by such county for not less than


thirty (30) days immediately prior to said such election: And


provided, further, that if. If there is only one paper published in


such county, publication in that paper for the required time shall


be sufficient; and if. If no paper be published therein in such


county and the county does not maintain an Internet website for


official publications, notice of such election shall be given by


posting up written or printed notices thereof for the required time,

Req. No. 2334 Page 48


at least one in each voting precinct of such county at the most


public places in said such precinct.


SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 733, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 733. The board of county commissioners shall cause an


advertisement for bids for the erection of such buildings to be


printed in some newspaper printed in the county, or of general


circulation therein if there be no newspaper published in said the


county, or published on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county, for a period of at least


thirty (30) days prior to the date set for the opening of bids, and


in such other newspapers in the state as the board may deem


advisable. Such advertisement shall give the place where the plans


and specifications may be examined, the date on which bids will be


opened, the time which will be allowed for the completion of such


building, and such other information as the board may direct. Bids


may be opened, considered, passed upon, and contracts for the


erection of said such buildings let at any regular session of said


the board, or at a special session thereof of the board called for


such purpose, but in all cases the bids must be opened and contracts


let in open session of said the board. The lowest responsible bid


must in all cases be accepted unless all bids are rejected, and the


contract for such buildings shall be so conditioned that not more


than ninety percent (90%) of the price agreed to be paid for the

Req. No. 2334 Page 49


construction thereof shall be paid until the terms of the contract


shall have been fully complied with and the buildings completed to


the satisfaction of the board and accepted by them. The said board


of county commissioners may require to be filed with each bid a


bond, or in lieu thereof a certified check, conditioned that the


bidder will enter into a contract with approved security for the


performance of the work in accordance with the plans and


specifications in case his bid be accepted, and, when such contract


is awarded to any such bidder, such bidder shall execute to the


county a good and sufficient bond in the sum of such contract, with


two or more sureties, to be approved by the board of county


commissioners, conditioned for the faithful and full performance of


such contract.


SECTION 15. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 736, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 736. The board of county commissioners shall give


thirty (30) days’ notice of the election upon the question of


issuing said such bonds, by publication in two weekly newspapers of


general circulation published at the county seat of the county,


unless there be but one weekly newspaper, in which event that one


shall be sufficient; and if. The county may choose to give notice


by weekly publication on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county. Such publication shall be


made for two (2) consecutive weeks. If there be no weekly newspaper

Req. No. 2334 Page 50


or Internet website, then such notice shall be given by five notices


posted in five public places within the county for (2) successive


weeks. The notices of election shall contain the statement of the


county commissioners, as provided by the preceding section, date of


election, amount of bonds proposed to be issued, and whether for


courthouse or jail or for both courthouse and jail. The notices


shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners


and attested by the county clerk.


SECTION 16. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 740, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 740. A. The board of county commissioners, and


district judge and county judge of any county in this state may use


for the purpose of erecting, remodeling, or rebuilding at the county


seat a courthouse or, jail, or both, at the county seat such


courthouse and jail, all or any portion of the sinking fund of the


county derived from penalties, interest, and forfeitures accrued, or


to accrue, and in addition thereto, where.


B. Where a mill tax for courthouse or jail purposes has been,


or may be voted by a majority of the qualified electors of said the


county covering a period of years, the county commissioners, and


district judge and county judge of said such county may make an


estimate of the amount that the said levy together with the sinking


fund, interest, and penalties so derived will raise during the


entire period of time for which said such mill levy has been or may

Req. No. 2334 Page 51


be voted, based on the average valuation of the property in said


such county for the last past five (5) years and may contract for


and cause to be erected at the county seat a courthouse and, jail,


or either in said county, at the county seat thereof such courthouse


and jail, and may draw warrants against said the estimate in payment


therefor of such, which shall be a legal charge against said such


county, payable out of the fund thus derived. Said Such warrants to


be issued in amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)


each, and when funds accumulate in the county treasury to the credit


of said such fund sufficient to pay one or more of said such


warrants the county treasurer shall give notice by publication in a


newspaper published in said the county or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county that the money is


available to pay said warrants, or warrant or warrants, giving the


number and date of said such warrant or warrants, and unless said


such warrant, or warrants, are presented for payment within thirty


(30) days from the date of said publications such notice, said


warrants, or such warrant, or warrants so advertised shall cease to


draw interest.


Said C. The contract for the building as aforesaid shall be


approved by the county commissioners, and district judge and county


judge of said such county. This act section shall not be construed


as affecting or repealing any existing law and shall be cumulative


in its operation and effect.

Req. No. 2334 Page 52


SECTION 17. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 765, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 765. In all such cases where the tax rolls and the


records of the county treasurer’s office, pertaining to the taxes on


any of the property in the county, have been destroyed as aforesaid,


the board of county commissioners shall have power and authority to


order and direct, by proclamation in three successive issues of some


weekly newspaper or published weekly on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county for three (3)


successive issues and by posting one copy of said resolution and


proclamation on the front door of each and every school house in


said county consecutive weeks, that all persons holding tax receipts


for three (3) years immediately prior to the first publication of


said such proclamation, for the past three (3) years, shall be


required to present the same to the county treasurer, that he may


give proper credit for the taxes against said such property, and


upon a failure of any person so to present said such tax receipts


within ninety (90) days after publication and posting of such


resolution or proclamation the presumption shall be that the taxes


for such year or years have not been paid, and if such delinquent


taxpayer shall fail within six (6) months to make satisfactory proof


to the board of county commissioners that the taxes on such property


have been paid, then it shall be conclusively presumed that the



Req. No. 2334 Page 53


taxes on such property have not been paid prior to the time the


records thereof of such were destroyed.


SECTION 18. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 782, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 782. Upon the adoption by the county commissioners of a


resolution declaring the necessity therefor, or whenever twenty


percent (20%) of the qualified voters of any county of this state,


as determined by the last previous general election, shall petition


the board of county commissioners of such county to call an election


for the purpose of issuing bonds to purchase sites, erect and


construct county hospitals, including alterations, additions to and


enlargement of existing hospital buildings, it shall be the duty of


said the board of county commissioners to call an election and give


notice thereof of such in two (2) daily or weekly newspapers of


general circulation published at the county seat of the county;


provided, that if. If there be one daily or weekly newspaper


published in such county, in that event one shall be sufficient, and


such notices shall be published for four (4) consecutive weeks. The


county may choose to give notice by publication on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county. Such


publication shall be made once weekly for four (4) consecutive


weeks. If there is no daily or weekly newspaper published in such


county, and the county does not maintain an Internet website for


official publications, then printed notices shall be posted in one

Req. No. 2334 Page 54


of the most public places in each voting precinct of the county at


least thirty (30) days prior to said such election. Said The


petition calling for said such election shall name the amount of


bonds to be issued and shall state the time of holding said such


election, which shall not be less than thirty (30) days from the


first publication of any notice or the posting of said such notice,


and shall state for what purposes the hospital is to be used.


SECTION 19. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 788, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 788. (a) A. All contracts for county hospital


construction work, alteration, additions, or repairs exceeding Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year, shall be let to


the lowest responsible bidder or bidders after notice of publication


in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where


the work is to be done in two consecutive weekly issues of the


newspaper or by weekly publication on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county where the work is to


be done for two (2) consecutive weeks. Each bid shall be


accompanied by a certified or cashier’s check equal to five percent


(5%) of the bid or Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), whichever is


the smaller, which shall be deposited with the board of control as a


guaranty, and forfeited to the county treasurer to the credit of the


county hospital fund in the event the successful bidder fails to


comply with the terms of the proposal, and returned to the

Req. No. 2334 Page 55


successful bidder on execution and delivery of the bond herein


provided for, and the checks of the unsuccessful bidders shall be


returned to them in accordance with the terms of the proposal.


(b) B. All notices of the letting of contracts under this


section shall state the time and place bids will be received and


opened. Such bids shall be sealed and opened only at the time and


place mentioned in the notice and in the presence of a majority of


the members of the board of control. The successful bidder for the


construction of the work shall enter into a contract on a form


furnished and prescribed by the board of control and shall give good


and sufficient performance bond in a sum equal to the contract


price, to the county, with sureties approved by the board of


control, to insure the proper and prompt completion of the work in


accordance with the provisions of the contract and the plans and


specifications; bonds shall also be posted to protect against unpaid


claims of subcontractors, laborers, and suppliers. Provided, that


if in the opinion of a majority of the board of control, the lowest


responsible bid or bids for the construction herein authorized to be


constructed shall be excessive, then and in that event the board of


control shall have the right to reject any or all bids and to


readvertise the same for additional bids. The board of control


within its discretion and where it is in the best interests of


hospital construction, may extend a contract not to exceed ten


percent (10%) of the length and extent of the original project, such

Req. No. 2334 Page 56


extension work to be paid for at a price not greater than the


contract unit basis. No work shall be initiated until the


contractor furnishes the board with certificates of insurance for


workmen’s compensation, public liability, and builders’ risk.


(c) C. When quality and prices are equal preference shall be


given materials produced within the State of Oklahoma this state,


and preference shall also be given construction contractors


domiciled, having and maintaining offices in and being citizen


taxpayers of the State of Oklahoma this state.


(d) D. When any contract for the construction or improvement of


a county hospital has not been carried out, or work thereunder has


been suspended by virtue of an order or directive of any officer or


agency of the federal or state government, issued under authority


vested in or delegated to such officer or agency, or if the


contractor defaults, the board shall proceed against the contractor


and/or his or their bonds, if he or she has caused the postponement


or cancellation of the contract, and the board shall then have the


right to advertise in the manner provided for hereinabove in this


section to relet the contract for the uncompleted portion.


(e) E. Five percent (5%) of the total amount of money due under


contract with the board of control for county hospital construction


work shall be retained by the board until the contractor to whom


payment is due files with the board a certified copy of a personal


tax receipt, showing payment of personal property taxes due on the

Req. No. 2334 Page 57


contractor’s equipment and supplies, from the county treasurer of


the county wherein the property is assessed, or is required to be


assessed, and evidence of having proper workmen’s compensation


coverage for employees as provided by Title 85 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, Section 61.


SECTION 20. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 794, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 794. The financial books and records of each county-


owned hospital operating under authority of existing law must be


audited for the preceding fiscal year, within ninety (90) days of


the close of each year, by an independent accountant who is vested


with the authority to practice the profession of accounting and


auditing as a public accountant in conformity with the laws of the


State of Oklahoma this state. The public accountant performing such


a hospital audit must investigate and report upon the manner in


which the county hospital is complying with the statutes pertaining


to the financial operation of said such hospital and upon the manner


in which the county hospital is conforming to the books, forms, and


accounting methods adopted and approved by the American Hospital


Association and the Oklahoma Hospital Association. Four (4) copies


of the audit report for each fiscal year must be filed within one


hundred twenty (120) days after the end of the fiscal year, one with


the board of county commissioners, one in the office of the county


clerk, one with the district attorney, and one with the State

Req. No. 2334 Page 58


Auditor and Inspector, and publication of the existence and location


of these audit reports shall be made by publication in a newspaper


for two (2) issues in general circulation in the county or by weekly


publication on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county for two (2) consecutive weeks. The cost of


such audits shall be determined by the board of control of such


county-owned hospitals by reference to generally accepted practices


in the field of certified public accounting, and the payment for


such audits shall be made by the allowance of claims by the board of


control. In addition to, or in lieu of, the above provided annual


audit, it shall be possible upon request of the county commissioners


of any county, or upon request of the Governor, signed by five


percent (5%) of the legal voters of any county, or by order of the


Governor, to cause the State Auditor and Inspector to audit, for the


preceding fiscal year, the books and records of the county-owned


hospital operating under authority of existing law, and the cost of


such audit shall be a proper charge against funds otherwise provided


for by law.


SECTION 21. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 863.26, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 863.26. A. Notice of all public hearings herein


provided for shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of


general circulation in the county or on an Internet website for



Req. No. 2334 Page 59


official publications maintained by the county at least fifteen (15)


days prior to the date of such hearing.


B. In addition to the notice required in subsection A of this


section, if the zoning change requested permits the use of treatment


facilities, multiple family facilities, transitional living


facilities, halfway houses, and any housing or facility that may be


used for medical or nonmedical detoxification as these terms are


defined pursuant to Section 3-403 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the entity proposing the zoning change shall mail a


written notice within thirty (30) days of the hearing to all real


property owners within one-quarter (1/4) of a mile where the area to


be affected is located and shall be responsible for all costs


incurred in mailing this notice.


For purposes of this subsection, “entity” means any individual,


corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, state


agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county,


incorporated municipality or municipal authority, or trust in which


any governmental entity is a beneficiary, venture, or other legal


entity however organized.


SECTION 22. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 865.66, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 865.66. A. Notice of all public hearings herein


provided for shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of


general circulation in the municipality and the county at least

Req. No. 2334 Page 60


fifteen (15) days prior to the date of such hearing. Notice may


also be given on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county by one publication at least fifteen (15)


days prior to the date of such hearing.


B. In addition to the notice required in subsection A of this


section, if the zoning change requested permits the use of treatment


facilities, multiple family facilities, transitional living


facilities, halfway houses, and any housing or facility that may be


used for medical or nonmedical detoxification as these terms are


defined pursuant to Section 3-403 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the entity proposing the zoning change shall mail a


written notice within thirty (30) days of the hearing to all real


property owners within one-quarter (1/4) of a mile where the area to


be affected is located and shall be responsible for all costs


incurred in mailing this notice.


For purposes of this subsection, “entity” means any individual,


corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, state


agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county,


incorporated municipality or municipal authority, or trust in which


any governmental entity is a beneficiary, venture, or other legal


entity however organized.


SECTION 23. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 866.29, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 2334 Page 61


Section 866.29. A. Notice of all public hearings herein


provided for shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of


general circulation in the municipality and the county at least


fifteen (15) days prior to the date of such hearing. Notice may


also be given on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county by one publication at least fifteen (15)


days prior to the date of such hearing.


B. In addition to the notice required in subsection A of this


section, if the zoning change requested permits the use of treatment


facilities, multiple family facilities, transitional living


facilities, halfway houses, and any housing or facility that may be


used for medical or nonmedical detoxification as these terms are


defined pursuant to Section 3-403 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the entity proposing the zoning change shall mail a


written notice within thirty (30) days of the hearing to all real


property owners within one-quarter (1/4) of a mile where the area to


be affected is located and shall be responsible for all costs


incurred in mailing this notice.


For purposes of this subsection, “entity” means any individual,


corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, state


agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county,


incorporated municipality or municipal authority, or trust in which


any governmental entity is a beneficiary, venture, or other legal


entity however organized.

Req. No. 2334 Page 62


SECTION 24. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 868.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 868.3. A. The county board of adjustment shall be


composed of three resident property owners of the county to be


appointed by the board of county commissioners. At least one member


shall be a resident of the county seat of such county and at least


one member shall be duly licensed as an attorney in the State of


Oklahoma this state. The term of each member shall be three (3)


years except that the terms shall be overlapping and the membership


of the board first appointed shall be for terms of one (1), two (2)


and three (3) years, respectively. The board of county


commissioners is hereby authorized to fill vacancies which may occur


in the board and to appoint a substitute or substitutes to serve in


a particular case in which a member or members shall certify his


disqualification. Members may be removed by the board of county


commissioners for cause after a public hearing held for that


purpose, and vacancies shall be filled by additional appointments.


All members of the county board of adjustment shall serve as such


without compensation.


B. The county board of adjustment shall elect its own chairman


and shall adopt rules of procedure consistent with the provisions of


the zoning regulations and the provisions of this act Section 868.1


et seq. of this title. The chairman, or in his or her absence the


acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of

Req. No. 2334 Page 63


witnesses. All hearings of the county board of adjustment shall be


open to the public, and minutes shall be kept of all proceedings and


official actions, which minutes shall, be filed in the office of the


board, and shall be a public record. The board of adjustment shall


fix a reasonable time for the hearing of any appeal and every appeal


shall be heard within sixty (60) days from the date of filing.


C. Notice of hearings before the county board of adjustment


shall be given by at least one (1) publication in a newspaper of


general circulation in the county or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county and by mail to the


record owners of lands contiguous to the affected area at least


fifteen (15) days prior to the date of such hearing.


SECTION 25. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 868.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 868.5. A. The county planning commission shall hold at


least one regular meeting each month. The commission shall elect a


chair who shall serve for one (1) year with eligibility for


reelection. The commission shall adopt rules of procedure for the


transaction of its business, set fees for building permits and time


periods for filing petitions and fees for amendments to zoning


regulations which shall be approved and adopted by the board of


county commissioners. The county planning commission shall keep a


public record of its resolutions, transactions, findings, and


recommendations.

Req. No. 2334 Page 64


B. Before holding any hearing hereinafter provided for in this


act Section 868.1 et seq. of this title, the county planning


commission shall give notice stating the nature of the hearing and


the time and place where it shall be held. Such notice shall be


given at least once each week for three (3) successive weeks prior


to the date of such hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in


the county or on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county.


SECTION 26. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 872, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 872. A petition shall be filed with the board of county


commissioners signed by a majority of the holders of title to lands


in the proposed district desiring to be embraced in such district,


which petition shall set forth the name of the proposed district,


the boundaries of the proposed district, and shall pray that the


same be organized into a sewer improvement district under the


provisions of this act Section 871 et seq. of this title. The


petition must be accompanied by a map of the proposed district, such


map showing the boundaries of said such district, and the


approximate proposed location of sewer line or lines, and the sewage


treatment plant, if any. The map shall be drawn to a scale of not


less than two (2) inches to the mile. The petitioners must


accompany the petition with a good and sufficient bond, to be


approved by the board of county commissioners in double the amount

Req. No. 2334 Page 65


of the probable cost of organizing such district, conditioned that


the bondsmen will pay all costs in case said such organization shall


not be effected. Such petition shall be filed with the county


clerk. Notice shall be published one time at least ten (10) days


before the time at which such petition will be considered in some


newspaper printed and published in the county or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county, stating


the time when the petition will be considered by the board of county


commissioners, and that all persons interested may appear and be


heard. Such notice, when published, shall contain therein a brief


substance of the contents of the petition. The board of county


commissioners shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear and


determine all contests and objections to the creation of such


district and all matters pertaining to the same, and at the time set


for said such hearing the same, the board may amend the plan for


such improvement district by excluding from within its boundaries


any lands which it may deem will not be benefited by the formation


of such district, or by including other lands as a part of such


district, upon the application of the owner filed at or prior to


said such hearing. At such hearing said the board shall also


determine whether or not the formation of such improvement district


as originally presented or in a modified form will be conducive or


beneficial to the public health and if said the board determines


that it will, then said the board shall make an order establishing

Req. No. 2334 Page 66


such sewer improvement district subject to the result of an election


to be held therein in such proposed improvement district and said


the board shall give notice of an election to be held in such


proposed improvement district for the purpose of determining whether


or not the same shall be organized under the provisions of this act


Section 871 et seq. of this title. Such notice shall describe the


boundaries as established and shall designate a name for such


proposed district and said such notice shall be published for at


least two (2) weeks prior to said such election in some newspaper of


general circulation in the county or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county. Such notice shall


require the electors to cast ballots which contain the words:


“Sewer Improvement District _______ Yes”, or “Sewer Improvement


District ________ No”, or words equivalent thereto. All persons,


resident of such proposed district, who are qualified electors in


their respective precincts, shall be qualified to vote on the


proposition.


SECTION 27. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 872.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 872.1. Upon the filing of a petition with the board of


county commissioners for a change of boundary lines of any sewer


improvement district signed by a majority of the holders of title to


lands of the area proposed to be annexed to an adjacent sewer


improvement district, the board of county commissioners shall cause

Req. No. 2334 Page 67


notice to be published one time in some newspaper printed and


published in the county and of general circulation in the area


sought to be annexed or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county at least ten (10) days before


the time at which such petition will be considered. Such notice


shall state the time and place when and where the petition will be


considered by the board of county commissioners, a brief substance


of the petition, and that all persons interested may appear and be


heard. The board of county commissioners shall have exclusive


jurisdiction to hear and determine all contests and objections


pertaining to such annexation, and at the time set for hearing the


board may amend the plan of annexation by excluding from within its


boundaries lands which it may deem will not be benefited by


annexation to such sewer improvement district. At such hearing the


board shall also determine whether or not the annexation of such


area to such sewer improvement district will be to the best


interests of the holders of title of the area affected, or conducive


or beneficial to the public health of said such area as now exists


or to be developed and if said such board determines that it will,


then it shall make an order annexing such area to said such


improvement district, and such territory for all purposes shall


thereafter be a part of such sewer improvement district. The


annexed territory shall assume its full proportion of all legal



Req. No. 2334 Page 68


indebtedness outstanding against the original sewer improvement


district, including bonded indebtedness.


SECTION 28. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 876, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 876. (a) A. The legal title to all property acquired


under this act Section 871 et seq. of this title shall immediately


and by operation of law vest in such sewer improvement district in


its corporate name and shall be held by such district in trust for,


and is hereby dedicated and set apart to, the uses and purposes set


forth in this act Section 871 et seq. of this title. The board of


directors of such district is hereby authorized to hold, use,


acquire, manage, occupy, and possess such property as herein


provided.


(b) B. The board of directors shall have authority to contract


for the sale of the sewerage system of the district with a city or


town, including the lines of conveyance, plant, and other real or


personal property used in connection therewith, on such terms as it


believes to be for the best interests of the district, but no such


contract shall be operative or valid until approved by a majority of


the electors of the district voting at a special election called for


such purpose by the board of directors. Such special election shall


be called and conducted and notice thereof given as in the case of a


special election on the issuance of bonds of the district. The


board of directors shall canvass the result of such special election

Req. No. 2334 Page 69


and make record thereof in its minutes, and if the proposed contract


shall have been approved at such election, the board of directors


shall execute necessary conveyances to carry out the terms of the


contract; and the purchaser shall thereupon have the right to fix


and collect reasonable tolls and charges for the use of the system


so purchased. Provided, that the purchase price for such sewerage


system shall not be less than the principal amount of the


outstanding main sewer line and sewage disposal plant bonds


outstanding plus the interest on said such bonds to the first call


date thereof. The proceeds of such sale shall be applied to the


payment of the principal and interest of outstanding bonds of the


district, and any excess shall be paid to the owners of the lots and


pieces of ground in the district, in proportion to the assessed


value thereof.


(c) C. 1. After the execution of the necessary conveyances to


carry out the terms of the contract for sale the board of directors


shall pay all outstanding valid claims for the operation and


maintenance of the district.


The 2. After such payment, the board of directors shall then


make a report in writing to the board of county commissioners,


advising said county commissioners such of the sale of the district,


including the terms of sale, disposition of the proceeds of the


sale, that all valid claims for operation and maintenance have been


paid, and petitioning for the dissolution of said the district.

Req. No. 2334 Page 70


3. The board of county commissioners shall cause notice of said


such petition for dissolution to be published one (1) time in some


newspaper printed and published in the county and of general


circulation in the district or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county at least ten (10) days before


the time at which such petition will be considered. Such notice


shall state the time and place, when and where the petition will be


considered by the board of county commissioners, a brief substance


of the petition, and that all persons interested may appear and be


heard. The board of county commissioners shall have exclusive


jurisdiction to hear and determine all contests and objections


pertaining to such dissolution. At such hearing the board of county


commissioners shall determine whether there is any reason or


necessity for the continued existence of such district. If said


such board determines that there is no reason or necessity for the


continued existence of said such district it shall issue its order


dissolving said such sewer improvement district, vacating all the


offices thereof, and discharging the officers from further


liability.


SECTION 29. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 880, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 880. Whenever such district sewer or sewers shall have


been authorized, the said board of directors shall then proceed to


employ a registered professional engineer licensed in the State of

Req. No. 2334 Page 71


Oklahoma this state, and cause to be prepared profiles, plans and


specifications for the work, together with a complete estimate of


the cost. Upon the completion of such plans and specifications and


their adoption by the said board of directors, they shall advertise


for sealed bids for the performance of such work for at least ten


(10) days, if published in a daily newspaper of general circulation


within the district, or at least two (2) successive weeks if


published in a weekly newspaper of general circulation within the


district, or by weekly publication for at least (2) consecutive


weeks if published on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county. In either case, such newspaper must be


one of general circulation within the district and such The notice


may contain any reasonable conditions to be imposed by said the


board of directors with reference to the letting of such contracts


and shall require the giving of a good and sufficient bond for the


faithful execution of work and the performance of the contract and


for the protection of the district and all property owners against


any loss or damage by the negligent execution of such work. Such


The notice shall also advise all parties interested that they may


appear and protest against such proposed improvement or any part


thereof. At the time and place specified in the notice the board of


directors shall award the contract to the lowest and best bidder for


the work, which contract shall in no case exceed the aggregate


estimate of cost submitted with the plans and specifications and

Req. No. 2334 Page 72


shall be subject to the right of the board of directors to reject


any and all bids and to readvertise for other bids, when none of the


same is, in their judgment, satisfactory.


SECTION 30. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 881, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 881. As soon as any subdistrict sewer line or lines


shall have been completed the engineer having charge of the work


shall compute the whole cost thereof which shall also include the


cost of advertising, appraising, engineering, and such other expense


necessary or essential or incident to the completion of such work


and shall apportion the same against all of the lots or pieces of


ground in such district in proportion to the area of the whole


subdistrict, exclusive of the public highways, and such officer


shall report the same to the board of directors and the said such


board of directors shall thereupon then assess a special tax against


each lot or piece of ground within said such subdistrict, which


assessment so made shall be published in some newspaper of the


county of general circulation within said such district or by weekly


publication on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county where such district is located for two (2)


consecutive weeks, during which time said such assessments without


interest may be paid to the clerk. If at the expiration of such


time the amount named in such assessment together with the cost of


publication, shall not be paid, then said such board of directors

Req. No. 2334 Page 73


shall cause special assessment bonds to be issued against such lots


or pieces of ground in said such subdistrict, which special


assessment bond shall recite the date and fact of the making of such


assessment, the amount of the assessment, the description of the


property against which the same is made, and that the same will be


charged or levied against said such property in five equal annual


installments with interest thereon at the rate of not to exceed six


percent (6%) per annum, each of said such installments to become due


and payable on the 1st day of September in each year which shall


become delinquent if not paid before October 1st in said such year


and said such bonds shall be signed by the director of the board of


directors and countersigned by the clerk and delivered to the


contractor; provided, that the other expenses incurred by said such


district in addition to the contract price of the work shall be paid


to the district by the contractor in cash and the aggregate amount


of such bonds delivered to the contractor shall not exceed his or


her contract price, and the amount of the expenses paid in cash to


the district by the contractor; provided, further, that in no case


shall said such district be empowered to pay any such special bonds


from any of the funds of said such district, nor shall it be liable


for the amount of such bonds, until the amount of said such


assessment shall be collected from the property described in said


such bonds. Said Such bonds shall bear four coupons evidencing


respectively the first, second, third, and fourth installments due

Req. No. 2334 Page 74


thereon; together with interest on the same and interest on the


unmatured installment or installments. The bond shall evidence the


fifth payment and interest thereon.


SECTION 31. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 884, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 884. A. 1. As soon as practicable after the


organization of such improvement district, the board of directors


shall, by resolution entered on its record, formulate a general plan


of proposed operation for the district, in which shall be stated


what constructed works or other property is proposed to be purchased


and the cost of purchasing the same, and what amount of construction


is proposed to be done and the cost of doing the same.


2. For the purpose of ascertaining the cost of any such


construction work, the board shall cause such preliminary surveys,


examinations, plans, and specifications to be made as shall furnish


a proper basis for the estimation of the cost of such work. Such


estimate of cost shall include the cost of advertising, appraising,


engineering, election, and such other expense as is necessary or


essential to the completion of the improvements. All such surveys,


examinations, maps, plans, and estimates shall be made under the


direction of a registered professional engineer licensed under the


laws of the State of Oklahoma this state and certified by him or her


and filed with the secretary of the district.



Req. No. 2334 Page 75


B. 1. Upon the filing of such plans and specifications the


board of directors shall proceed to determine the amount of money


necessary to be raised and shall immediately thereupon call a


special election, at which shall be submitted to the electors of


such district the question of whether or not the bonds of said such


district shall be issued in the amount so determined; provided, such


bonds shall not be issued for more than the actual estimated cost of


such improvements and construction work as certified by such


engineer.


2. Notice of such election must be given by posting notice in


three public places in each election precinct in said such district,


as established by said the board, for at least ten (10) days, and


also by publication of such notice in some newspaper published in


the county where the district is located or on an Internet website


for official publications maintained by such county once a week for


at least two (2) consecutive weeks. Such notice must specify the


time of holding the election, the amount of bonds proposed to be


issued, and state generally the purpose of the same and the election


must be held and the result thereof determined and declared in all


respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the statutory


provision governing the holding of elections in cities for the


issuance of general obligation bonds; provided, no informalities in


conducting such election shall invalidate the same if the elections


shall have been otherwise fairly conducted.

Req. No. 2334 Page 76


3. At such an election the ballots shall contain the words,


“Bonds ______ Yes”, or “Bonds _____ No”, or words equivalent


thereto. If a majority of the ballots cast are “Bonds ______ Yes”,


the board of directors shall pass a resolution providing for the


issuance of said such bonds. Such bonds shall be payable in lawful


money of the United States and shall run for a period of from ten


(10) to twenty (20) years as determined by the board of directors.


The principal and interest shall be payable at the office of the


clerk of the board of directors or at any bank or fiscal agency


designated by the board of directors. Such bonds shall be each of


the denomination of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor


more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), shall be negotiable in


form, executed in the name of the district and signed by the


director and the clerk and the seal of the district shall be affixed


thereto. Facsimile signatures and seals may be used as provided in


the Registered Public Obligations Act of Oklahoma.


C. 1. In the event the election hereinabove provided for in


this section is in favor of the issue of said such bonds then the


board of directors of said such district shall cause final


estimates, plans, profiles, and specifications to be made for the


work included in the preliminary plans and specifications by a


registered professional engineer licensed under the laws of the


State of Oklahoma this state in which shall be included the cost of


advertising, appraising, engineering, and such other expenses as is

Req. No. 2334 Page 77


necessary or essential to the completion of said such improvement


and shall by resolution adopt the same.


2. The bonds shall express on their face that they were issued


by the authority of Sections 871 et seq. of this title, stating its


title and date of approval. The clerk or appointed agent shall keep


a record of the bonds. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate of


not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum.


D. Should the election herein provided for result in a failure


to authorize the issuance of such bonds, the sewer improvement


district shall be automatically dissolved, after the expiration of


sixty (60) days from the date of such election; provided, that


should the board of directors call a second bond election, within


said such sixty (60) days period, then the life of said such sewer


improvement district shall be extended subject to the results of


said such second election. Should the second election result in a


failure to authorize the issuance of said such bonds then said such


district shall be deemed to be automatically dissolved. The county


election board shall file a report of all bond elections hereunder


with the clerk of said such board of directors and with the county


clerk of said such county.


SECTION 32. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 888, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 888. On or before the 15th day of May in each year the


assessor must complete his or her assessment book and deliver the

Req. No. 2334 Page 78


same to the clerk of the board, who must immediately give notice


thereof of such and of the time the board of directors, acting as a


board of equalization, will meet to equalize assessments, by weekly


publication of such notice in a newspaper published in the county or


on an Internet website for official publications maintained by the


county for two successive (2) consecutive weeks. The time fixed for


the meeting shall not be less than ten (10) nor more than (20) days


from the date of the first publication of the notice and in the


meantime the assessor’s books shall remain in the office of the


secretary for the inspection of all persons interested.


SECTION 33. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 893, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 893. After adopting the plans for the construction of


the district sewer lines, sewerage disposal, or treatment plant, or


parts thereof, and other work in connection therewith, and after


determining the property necessary to be acquired, and after the


bonds as hereinbefore provided for, have been authorized, the board


of directors shall give notice by publication thereof in some


newspaper published in said the county or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county, calling for bids for


the construction of said such work, or any portion thereof of such,


and to pay the expense of purchasing and acquiring the necessary


property, if any. Said Such notice shall be published in three (3)


issues of a daily newspaper or, for two (2) issues in a weekly

Req. No. 2334 Page 79


newspaper, or for two (2) consecutive weeks on an Internet website


for official publications maintained by the county, the last


publication to be at least ten (10) days prior to the date fixed for


receiving bids. The notice shall set forth that plans and


specifications can be seen at the office of the clerk and that the


board will receive sealed proposals therefor, and that the contract


will be let to the lowest responsible bidder, stating the time and


place for receiving and opening said such proposals in public. Said


Such notice shall set forth any reasonable terms and conditions that


the board shall deem proper to impose with reference to the letting


of the contract and the provisions thereof. Said Such notice shall


further set forth the nature of the performance and statutory bonds


required to be furnished. As soon as convenient thereafter the


board shall let such contract, either in part or in whole to the


lowest responsible bidder, and it may reject any and all bids and


readvertise for proposals. The person or persons to whom the


contract shall be awarded, shall enter into a bond with good and


sufficient sureties, in an amount equal to one hundred per cent


(100%) of the contract price for the faithful performance of the


contract, and also a good and sufficient bond to the State of


Oklahoma for the payment of all labor and material used in the


construction of such improvement. All such construction work shall


be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of the engineer


employed by said the board and be approved by the board.

Req. No. 2334 Page 80


SECTION 34. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 896, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 896. That the board of directors is authorized in its


discretion to file an application with the Supreme Court of Oklahoma


for the approval of any bonds or series of bonds to be issued


hereunder, and exclusive original jurisdiction is hereby conferred


upon the Supreme Court to hear and determine each such application.


It shall be the duty of the Court to give such applications


precedence over the other business of the court and to consider and


pass upon the applications and any protests which may be filed


thereto as speedily as possible. Notice of the hearing on each


application shall be given by a notice published in a newspaper of


general circulation in the county or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county that on a day named


the board will ask the court to hear its application and approve the


bonds. Such notice shall inform all persons interested that they


may file protests against the issuance of the bonds and be present


at the hearing and contest the legality thereof. Such notice shall


be published one (1) time not less than ten (10) days prior to the


date named for the hearing and the hearing may be adjourned from


time to time in the discretion of the court. If the court shall be


satisfied that the bonds have been properly authorized in accordance


with this act Section 872 et seq. of this title and that when issued


they will constitute valid obligations in accordance with their

Req. No. 2334 Page 81


terms, the court shall render its written opinion approving the


bonds and shall fix the time within which a petition for rehearing


may be filed. The decision of the court shall be a judicial


determination of the validity of the bonds, shall be conclusive as


to the board, its officers, and agents, and thereafter the bonds so


approved and the revenues pledged to their payment shall be


incontestable in any court in the State of Oklahoma this state.


SECTION 35. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 901.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 901.2. A. The petition shall set forth and


particularly describe the proposed boundaries of such district and


shall be accompanied by a map of such proposed district, drawn to a


scale of not less than one (1) inch to the mile. The petitioners


shall accompany such petition with a good and sufficient bond, the


amount and sureties of which shall be approved by the board of


county commissioners, the sum of which is sufficient to cover the


costs of the publications and of the election for the organization


of the district will be paid in the event that such organization


shall not be authorized or effected.


B. Such petition shall be filed with the county clerk of such


county who shall present it to the board of county commissioners at


their next regular or special meeting. Upon the presentation of


such petition, the board of county commissioners shall set the same


for hearing at a time not less than twenty (20) days nor more than

Req. No. 2334 Page 82


forty (40) days from the date of presentation and shall direct the


county clerk to give notice of such hearing by publication in a


newspaper of general circulation in the county in which such


proposed district is located or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by such county. Such notice shall be


published weekly for two (2) consecutive weeks next preceding the


date of such hearing. Such notice shall describe the boundaries of


the proposed district, shall state the time and place of the


hearing, and shall state that any person may appear and protest the


organization of the district or the proposed boundaries thereof.


C. 1. The board of county commissioners shall hold the hearing


described in said such notice, and it shall have jurisdiction to


hear and determine all protests to the creation of such district and


all matters pertaining to the same. It may amend the plan of such


district by excluding from within its boundaries any lands which it


may deem will not be benefited by the formation of such district, or


by including other lands as a part thereof upon application of the


owners of such land; provided, however, it shall not exclude from


such district any lands which are completely surrounded by lands


which are included in the proposed district.


2. At the conclusion of such hearing, the board of county


commissioners shall make an order determining the boundaries of the


proposed district, particularly describing them, and shall determine


whether the formation of such district will be conducive to the

Req. No. 2334 Page 83


public safety of the area incorporated therein in such district. If


said such board determines that such district will be conducive to


the public safety of the area incorporated therein in such district,


then said such board shall give such proposed district a name and


shall call an election of the qualified electors in the territory


comprising such proposed district on the question of whether said


such district shall be organized.


SECTION 36. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 901.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 901.3. The county clerk shall cause notice of the


election to be given by publication once a week for two (2)


successive consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation


in the territory comprising the proposed district is located, or


weekly publication for two (2) consecutive weeks on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county where the


proposed district is located. Such notice shall state the time and


place of holding the election and set forth the description of the


boundaries of the proposed district and its general purpose and


intention. Such notice shall require the electors to cast ballots


which contain the words: “Fire Protection District - Yes”, and


“Fire Protection District - No”, or words equivalent thereto. All


persons resident of such proposed district, who are qualified


electors in their respective precincts, shall be qualified to vote


on such proposition.

Req. No. 2334 Page 84


SECTION 37. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 901.15, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 901.15. A. 1. When the board of directors shall have


estimated the cost of such purchases and construction work, it shall


call an election at which shall be submitted to the electors of the


district the question of whether or not the bonds of the district


shall be issued in the amount so determined; provided, such bonds


shall not be issued for more than the actual estimated cost of such


purchase and construction.


2. The resolution of the board calling such election shall


divide the district into voting precincts of convenient size and a


map thereof shall be filed with the district clerk. Such precincts


so formed may be changed by the board any time thereafter, except


that no change shall be made within thirty (30) days next preceding


any election. The said Such resolution shall appoint for each


precinct, from the electors of the district, one (1) clerk and two


(2) judges, who shall constitute a board of election for such


precinct. If the members appointed do not attend at the opening of


the polls on the morning of the election, the board may appoint


other electors of the district to supply the place or places of


those absent. Said Such resolution shall designate the date, hour,


and place in the precincts where the election will be held.


B. Notice of such election shall be given by publication in


some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which such

Req. No. 2334 Page 85


district is located once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks next


preceding the date of such election, or by weekly publication on an


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county


in which such district is located, and by posting such notice in


three (3) public places in each election precinct, as established by


said the board of directors, for at least twenty (20) days prior to


the date of such election.


Such notice shall specify:


1. The date of the election.;


2. The location of the polling places.;


3. The time that the polls will open and close.; and


4. The amount of bonds proposed to be issued.


C. 1. One (1) of the judges of each precinct shall be chairman


of the election board of the precinct and may: first, administer


all oaths required in the progress of the election; second, and


appoint another judge or clerk, if during, the progress of the


election, any judge or clerk ceases to act.


2. At such election, the ballots shall contain the words:


“Bonds - Yes”, and “Bonds - No”, or words equivalent thereto.


The said 3. Such election shall be held as nearly as may be in


conformity with the provisions governing the election for the


formation of the district; provided, no informalities in conducting


such election shall invalidate the same if the election shall have


been otherwise fairly conducted.

Req. No. 2334 Page 86


D. The board of directors shall meet as soon as practicable


after the election and canvass the returns. If a majority of the


ballots cast are “Bonds - Yes”, the board shall cause negotiable


bonds in said such amount to be issued.


SECTION 38. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 901.17, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 901.17. The board shall sell such bonds from time to


time in such quantities as may be necessary and most advantageous to


raise the money for the construction of the proposed work, the


acquisition of property and rights and otherwise to fully carry out


the objects and purposes of this act Section 901.1 et seq. of this


title. Before making any sale of bonds the board shall, at a


meeting, by resolution, declare its intention to sell a specified


amount of the bonds and the day and hour and place of such sale and


shall cause such resolution to be entered in the minutes and notice


of the sale to be given by publication thereof of such at least ten


(10) days once weekly for two issues published a week apart in some


newspaper of said the county if published in a daily newspaper or


two (2) weeks if published in a weekly newspaper, or said such


notice may be published in on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county. Such publication shall be


made once weekly for two (2) issues of a daily newspaper provided


they are published a week apart consecutive weeks. Said Such bonds


may be sold either at public auction for cash to the highest bidder

Req. No. 2334 Page 87


or upon sealed bids as determined by the board of directors. At the


time appointed, the board shall award the purchase of the bonds to


the highest responsible bidder, but shall reserve and always have


the right to reject any and all bids, but said the board shall in no


event sell any of said such bonds for less than par with accrued


interest.


SECTION 39. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 901.42, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 901.42. The board shall hold a public hearing on the


proposed budget no later than fifteen (15) days prior to the


beginning of the budget year. Notice of the date, time, and place


of the hearing, together with the proposed budget summaries, shall


be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district


or on an Internet website for official publications maintained by


the county where the district is located not less than five (5) days


before the date of the hearing. Affidavit and proof of publication


shall be attached to the budget when filed with the county clerk and


State Auditor and Inspector. The district shall make available a


sufficient number of copies of the proposed budgets as the board


shall determine and have them available for review or for


distribution or sale at the office of the district. At the public


hearing on the budgets, any person may present to the board


comments, recommendations, or information on any part of the


proposed budget.

Req. No. 2334 Page 88


SECTION 40. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 902.3, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 902.3. A. The petition shall set forth and


particularly describe the proposed boundaries of such district and


shall be accompanied by a map of such proposed district. The


petitioners shall accompany such petition with a cash deposit, the


amount of which shall be approved by the board of county


commissioners. The cash shall be deposited with the county


treasurer in a special fund which shall be used for the purposes of


defraying the costs of the publications and of the election for the


organization of the district. Any unused portion of the amount


deposited shall be refunded to the petitioners upon request.


B. The petition shall be filed with the county clerk of such


county who shall present it to the board of county commissioners at


their next regular or special meeting. Upon the presentation of the


petition, the board of county commissioners shall set the petition


for hearing at a time not less than twenty (20) days nor more than


forty (40) days from the date of presentation and shall direct the


county clerk to give notice of the hearing by publication in a


newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed


district is located or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county in which the proposed district


is located. The notice shall be published one (1) day a week for


two (2) consecutive weeks preceding the date of such hearing. The

Req. No. 2334 Page 89


notice shall describe the boundaries of the proposed district, shall


state the time and place of the hearing, and shall state that any


person may appear and protest the organization of the district or


the proposed boundaries of the district.


C. The board of county commissioners shall hold the hearing


described in the notice, and it shall have jurisdiction to hear and


determine all protests to the creation of such district and all


matters pertaining to the same. It may amend the plan of the


district by excluding from within its boundaries any lands which it


may deem will not be benefited by the formation of such district, or


by including other lands as a part thereof upon application of the


owners of such land. However, it shall not exclude from such


district any lands which are completely surrounded by lands which


are included in the proposed district.


D. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board of county


commissioners shall make an order determining the boundaries of the


proposed district, particularly describing them, and shall determine


whether the formation of such district will be conducive to the


improvement of safe travel in the incorporated area. If the board


determines that the district will be conducive to safe travel in the


area incorporated in the district and will be in the best interests


of the people residing or owning real property in the district, then


the board may give the proposed district a name and call an election


of the registered voters in the territory comprising such proposed

Req. No. 2334 Page 90


district, or if there are no registered voters in the territory


comprising the proposed district, call an election of the owners of


real property in the territory comprising the proposed district who


are registered voters, on the question of whether the district shall


be organized. In proclaiming the election, the board of county


commissioners shall provide descriptions of the boundaries of the


proposed district and maps of the proposed district in sufficient


quantities to provide one for each polling place to be open during


the election.


SECTION 41. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 902.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 902.4. The county clerk shall cause notice of the


election to be given one (1) day a week for two (2) consecutive


weeks by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the


territory comprising the proposed district or on an Internet website


maintained by the county where the proposed district is located.


The notice shall state the time and place of holding the election


and set forth the description of the boundaries of the proposed


district and its general purpose and intention. All persons who are


residents of the proposed district and who are registered voters in


their respective precincts shall be qualified to vote on the


proposition. If there are no persons who are residents of the


proposed district, all persons owning real property within the



Req. No. 2334 Page 91


proposed district who are registered voters shall be qualified to


vote on the proposition.


SECTION 42. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 902.12, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 902.12. A. When the board of directors shall have


estimated the cost of purchases and construction work, it shall call


an election at which shall be submitted to the registered voters of


the district, or, if there are no registered voters of the district,


the owners of real property in the district who are registered


voters, the question of whether the bonds of the district shall be


issued in the amount so determined. However, the bonds shall not be


issued for more than the actual estimated cost of such purchase and


construction.


B. The resolution of the board calling such election shall


divide the district into voting precincts of convenient size and a


map thereof shall be filed with the district secretary. The


precincts so formed may be changed by the board any time thereafter,


except that no change shall be made within thirty (30) days next


preceding any election. The resolution shall appoint for each


precinct, from the owners of real property in and residents of the


district who are registered voters, or if there are no residents of


the district, the owners of real property in the district who are


registered voters, one clerk and two judges, who shall constitute a


board of election for the precinct. If the members appointed do not

Req. No. 2334 Page 92


attend at the opening of the polls on the morning of the election,


the board may appoint other owners of real property in and residents


of the district who are registered voters, or if there are no


residents of the district, owners of real property in the district


who are registered voters, to supply the place or places of those


absent. The resolution shall designate the date, hour and place in


the precincts where the election will be held.


C. Notice of the election shall be given by publication in some


newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the district


is located or by weekly publication on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county in which the district


is located once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks next


preceding the date of the election, and by posting the notice in


three public places in each election precinct, as established by the


board of directors, for at least twenty (20) days prior to the date


of the election.


The notice shall specify:


1. The date of the election;


2. The location of the polling places;


3. The time that the polls will open and close; and


4. The amount of bonds proposed to be issued.


D. One of the judges of each precinct shall be chairman of the


election board of the precinct and may administer all oaths required


in the progress of the election, and appoint another judge or clerk,

Req. No. 2334 Page 93


if during the progress of the election any judge or clerk ceases to


act.


E. At the election, the ballots shall contain the words:


“Bonds - Yes”, and “Bonds - No”, or words equivalent thereto.


F. The election shall be held as nearly as may be in conformity


with the provisions governing the election for the formation of the


district. However, no county election board nor precinct election


board shall be involved in conducting the election. No


informalities in conducting the election shall invalidate the


election if the election shall have been otherwise fairly conducted.


G. The board of directors shall meet as soon as practicable


after the election and canvass the returns. If a majority of the


ballots cast are “Bonds - Yes”, the board shall cause negotiable


bonds in the amount to be issued.


SECTION 43. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 902.14, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 902.14. The board shall sell such bonds from time to


time in such quantities as may be necessary and most advantageous to


raise the money for the construction of the proposed work, the


acquisition of property and rights and otherwise to fully carry out


the objects and purposes of the Oklahoma Rural Road Improvement


District Act. Before making any sale of bonds the board shall, at a


meeting, by resolution, declare its intention to sell a specified


amount of the bonds and the day and hour and place of such sale and

Req. No. 2334 Page 94


shall cause such resolution to be entered in the minutes and notice


of the sale to be given by publication thereof of such at least ten


(10) days once weekly for two issues published a week apart in some


newspaper of said the county if published in a daily newspaper or


two (2) weeks if published in a weekly newspaper, or said such


notice may be published in two issues of a daily newspaper provided


they are published a week apart once weekly for two (2) consecutive


weeks on an Internet website for official publications maintained by


the county. Said Such bonds may be sold either at public auction


for cash to the highest bidder or upon sealed bids as determined by


the board of directors. At the time appointed, the board shall


award the purchase of the bonds to the highest responsible bidder,


but shall reserve and always have the right to reject any and all


bids, but said the board shall in no event sell any of said such


bonds for less than par with accrued interest.


SECTION 44. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 902.21, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 902.21. A. Directors of a rural road improvement


district shall be the owners of real property in and residents of


the district or, if there are no residents of the district, the


owners of real property in the district. At the time of making its


order organizing the district, the board of county commissioners


shall set a first meeting of property owners of the district and


direct the manner of giving notice by publication thereof. The

Req. No. 2334 Page 95


owners of property within the district present at such meeting shall


elect nine (9) directors who shall hold their office until the


second Saturday in January of each even-numbered year, at which time


their successors shall be elected. The property owners present at


the first meeting shall adopt the bylaws of the district.


B. Subsequent elections for directors of the district may be


held at a mass meeting or convention of the owners of real property


in and residents of the district, or if there are no residents of


the district, the owners of real property in the district, who are


qualified to vote. The voting shall be by secret ballot. At the


first regular election after organization of the district called for


the purpose of electing members of the board of directors, the three


qualified persons receiving the highest number of votes for member


of board of directors of the district shall hold their respective


offices for a term of six (6) years. The three qualified persons


receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected for four


(4) years, and the three qualified persons having the next highest


number of votes shall be elected for two (2) years. Each two (2)


years thereafter, there shall be elected for a term of six (6) years


three members of the board of directors. Notice of the mass meeting


or convention called for the purpose of electing directors of a


rural road improvement district shall be given by publishing notice


of the meeting stating the time, place, and agenda in a newspaper of


general circulation in the county in which such district is located

Req. No. 2334 Page 96


or on an Internet website for official publications maintained by


the county in which such district is located once a week for three


(3) consecutive weeks next preceding the date of the election, and


by posting the notice in three public places in the district for at


least twenty (20) days prior to the date of the election. The


notice shall list the offices to be filled and the questions to be


voted on, if any.


SECTION 45. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 904.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 904.1. A. The board of county commissioners of any


county, if the board determines that such would be conducive to the


promotion and preservation of the public safety of the county, may


call an election at which shall be submitted to the qualified voters


of the county the question of whether to create a county jail trust


authority.


B. Notice of the election shall be given by publication in some


newspaper of general circulation in the county or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county once a


week for two (2) consecutive weeks next preceding the date of the


election. The notice shall specify the date of the election. The


election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election


laws of this state. If a majority of the qualified voters of the


county voting on the question at an election called for such purpose



Req. No. 2334 Page 97


by the board of county commissioners approve, the county jail trust


authority shall be created.


SECTION 46. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 956, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 956. A. No member of a county retirement system shall


be eligible for retirement benefits under Section 951 et seq. of


this title until such member:


1. Has attained the age of sixty-two (62) years and shall have


served for a period of at least fifteen (15) years with said the


county;


2. Has attained the age of fifty-five (55) years and shall have


served for a period of at least thirty (30) years with said the


county; or


3. Has attained the age at which the sum of the employee’s age


and number of years of service with the county total eighty (80).


B. To be eligible for retirement benefits the employee’s


service with the county shall have ceased. Provided, the board of


trustees and the board of county commissioners, by resolution, may


allow retirees to return to work on a part-time basis after the


first month of retirement and continue to be eligible for their


retirement benefits. Provided, that any county employee who shall


have completed fifteen (15) years of service as such county


employee, and who, at the time of completing such fifteen (15) years


of service shall not have reached the age of sixty-two (62) years,

Req. No. 2334 Page 98


may then elect to retire, such retirement to become effective and


all retirement benefits to begin when such county employee shall


have attained the age of sixty-two (62) years, provided that such


election shall be in writing upon such form as the board of trustees


shall direct, and such election shall be signed by such employee and


filed with the board of trustees, and any funds paid into the


retirement system by such employee may not thereafter be withdrawn


by such employee. Provided, that when approved by the board of


trustees of the county retirement system and the board of county


commissioners of any county which has provided for a retirement fund


and system as authorized under the provisions of Section 951 of this


title, the board of trustees may lower the mandatory fifteen-year


requirement to not less than five (5) years by a resolution if the


following has occurred:


1. Prior to such action, an actuarial report on the system


shall be made by an independent professional actuary qualified as an


“Enrolled actuary” as defined by the Employee Retirement Income


Security Act (ERISA) of 1974, which report shall determine and


declare whether the reduction of the mandatory service requirement


would result in any additional unfunded or accrued liabilities and,


if so, the amount required to make the retirement system actuarially


sound expressed in dollars and in percent of the gross payroll.;


2. Such report shall be filed with the board of trustees and


with the board of county commissioners and notice of the receipt and

Req. No. 2334 Page 99


filing of such report be given by the board of county commissioners


by publishing notice thereof of such in a newspaper of general


circulation in or on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county. Such report shall be a public document


subject to examination by any interested person. Any member of the


retirement system or any citizen of the county may, within thirty


(30) days from the date of such publication, file a petition in the


district court of the county in which the retirement system is


located to challenge the validity and accuracy of the actuarial


report or any other action taken in connection therewith, and the


court is hereby vested with jurisdiction to receive evidence and


enter a judgment affirming, modifying or rejecting the actuarial


report or any funding provisions, and such report shall be conformed


in accordance with any final judgment. The costs, including


attorney fees, if any, of such action shall be assessed by the court


as it may deem equitable irrespective of the form of the judgment.;


3. If the final report determines that additional funding shall


be required to implement any reduction of the mandatory service


requirement, then and in that event affirmative action by the board


of county commissioners, approved by the board of trustees,


providing for the funding of any such changed benefits in an amount


necessary to make said such system actuarially sound upon the


implementation of such change shall be established at or prior to



Req. No. 2334 Page 100


the effective date of such reduction in the mandatory service


requirement.;


4. If the report reveals no additional funding requirement,


then the board of county commissioners with the approval of the


board of trustees may lower the mandatory fifteen-year service


requirement as provided in this section without a corresponding or


concurrent funding resolution.;


5. It is further provided that if the mandatory service credit


is reduced to a period of time less than fifteen (15) years, then


and in that event the retirement benefits shall be correspondingly


reduced by at least an amount equal to six and two-thirds percent (6


2/3%) from that which would have been earned for fifteen (15) years’


service multiplied by the number of years of reduction in the


mandatory service except for those retirees who have eight (8)


years’ service and are entitled to disability retirement. The


entitlement to disability retirement and the amount thereof shall


not be affected by this paragraph.; and


6. No person shall be entitled to receive the benefits of a


reduction in the mandatory service requirement who at the time of


such reduction is not then an employee of the county, has been


continuously employed by the county and a member of the county


retirement system for the twenty-four (24) months immediately


preceding the reduction in the mandatory service requirement or


shall have been an employee with twenty-four (24) months immediately

Req. No. 2334 Page 101


preceding the election by such employee to receive the benefit of


the reduced mandatory service requirement.


Provided further, that, for For the purposes of Section 951 et


seq. of this title and the eligibility of employees to participate


therein in such system, employees of levee districts shall be


considered county employees. Retirement benefits, disability


benefits, and benefits paid to the surviving spouse shall be


calculated on the average of the income of any three (3) years which


shall be the years of highest income for said such employee during


participation in said such retirement system.


C. Any member of the county retirement system covered by


Section 951 et seq. of this title who shall have completed eight (8)


years of employment with said the county and who, by reason of


disability resulting from the performance of his or her duties as


such employee of said the county, shall become disabled to such an


extent as to be unable to perform his or her duties as an employee


shall be entitled to disability retirement and to such benefits as


the board of trustees shall determine; provided, however, that the


board of trustees shall find that said such disability is total and


permanent, and resulted from the performance of his or her duty as


such employee of the county.


D. Any member of the county retirement system covered by


Section 951 et seq. of this title who has participated in the system


immediately preceding the time he or she is required, by Act of

Req. No. 2334 Page 102


Congress of the United States and/or or by order of the President of


the United States, or volunteers to leave the employment of the


county to enter the military service of the United States government


shall receive credit, for the purposes of Section 951 et seq. of


this title, for all actual time so served in full-time military


service, to the extent required by Internal Revenue Code Section


414(u) and the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights


Act of 1994. Provided further, that if any county employee who


shall have completed at least fifteen (15) years of service to any


county covered by Section 951 et seq. of this title and who has not


yet reached the age of retirement shall die, then, and in such


event, the surviving spouse of said such county employee shall


receive retirement benefits in the amount of sixty-six and two-


thirds percent (66 2/3%) of whatever benefits would otherwise be


received by said such county employee under Section 951 et seq. of


this title at the age of sixty-two (62) years, such retirement


benefits to the surviving spouse to begin on the date said such


deceased county employee would have reached the age of sixty-two


(62) years.


Provided further, that if E. 1. If any county employee


receiving or eligible to receive retirement benefits pursuant to the


provisions of Section 951 et seq. of this title shall die, then, and


in such event, the surviving spouse of said such person shall


receive retirement benefits in the amount of sixty-six and two-

Req. No. 2334 Page 103


thirds percent (66 2/3%) of whatever benefits the deceased was


receiving or was entitled to receive for the remainder of the


natural life of said such surviving spouse. This provision shall


apply to anyone who has qualified for retirement, even though they


may not have retired or are deceased. Said Such provision also


shall include any employees who have retired after January 1, 1970,


and later shall become deceased, then in such event the surviving


spouse shall receive sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%).


This shall not apply to persons who have retired prior to January 1,


1970, or their spouses.


Provided further, that the 2. The board of trustees and the


board of county commissioners may elect to amend the surviving


spouse benefit provision to increase the surviving spouse retirement


benefit to as much as one hundred percent (100%).


Provided further, that the F. The board of trustees and the


board of county commissioners may elect to amend the benefit


provisions to allow any vested employee who is otherwise not


eligible to retire because such employee has not satisfied any of


the age requirements the option of retiring as early as age fifty-


five (55). However, such employee shall have met the minimum


service requirements approved by the board of trustees of the county


retirement system and the board of county commissioners. If any


employee elects such an option, the employee shall receive an


actuarially reduced benefit.

Req. No. 2334 Page 104


SECTION 47. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1205, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1205. A. Whenever a petition, as provided in Section


1204 of this title, is filed with the county clerk, and then


verified by the county election board, the county commissioners


shall enter an order setting a public hearing on the petition for a


day certain and directing the county clerk to give notice of the


hearing by legal publication for two (2) consecutive weeks in a


newspaper published in each county containing any area embraced


within the boundaries of the proposed district, or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by such counties. Such


newspapers shall have a general circulation in the county of


publication. Provided, however, if If there is a county in which


there is no newspaper of general circulation published and no


Internet website for official publications is maintained by such


county, notice of the hearing shall be given by posting in five (5)


public places within the county, one of which shall be the county


courthouse.


B. Notice shall contain:


1. A brief and concise statement describing the purpose of the


hearing;


2. A description of the area to be embraced within the


district;



Req. No. 2334 Page 105


3. A notice to all persons residing, and incorporated


municipalities, within the proposed district that they may appear


upon the date and at the time and place of the hearing to show


cause, if any, why the petition should not be granted; and


4. A notice to all residents of the proposed district that, if


the district shall be ordered created, immediately following the


entry of the order creating the district an organizational meeting


to elect a board of directors and officers and to adopt bylaws will


be held.


C. The county clerk shall, at least ten (10) days before the


date fixed for the hearing, give or send notice thereof of the


hearing to each of the petitioners.


SECTION 48. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1234, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1234. A. Any county creating a road improvement


district pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1230 through 1262 of


this title, except as provided for in Section 1236 of this title,


shall provide notice to the affected record title holders of private


property and an opportunity to protest against said such


improvements. Any number of roads, streets, avenues, lanes, alleys,


or other public places, or parts thereof of such, to be improved may


be included in one notice. Any protest or objection shall be made


and considered separately as to each road, street, avenue, lane,


alley, or other public place, or parts thereof of such. For

Req. No. 2334 Page 106


purposes of protest in accordance with this section, disconnected


parts of the same street shall be treated as separate streets.


B. Upon the filing of said such plans, plat, typical section,


and preliminary estimate of the cost of such work or improvements


with the county clerk, the board of county commissioners shall


examine the same and, if found satisfactory, shall by resolution


adopt and approve the same and declare the improvement necessary to


be done. Said Such resolution shall be published in six consecutive


issues of a daily newspaper or, for two consecutive issues of a


weekly newspaper published in the county and having a general


circulation within the county, or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county once weekly for two


(2) consecutive weeks. The resolution shall provide that the record


title holders of more than forty percent (40%) of the area of land


liable to assessment to pay for the improvement of any road, street,


avenue, lane, alley, or other public place, or part thereof of such,


choosing to protest such road improvement shall file with the county


clerk of said county their protest in writing against the


improvement within fifteen (15) days after the last publication of


the resolution. If such protest is not filed within the specified


period, the county shall have the power to cause such improvements


to be made and to contract for such improvements and to levy


assessments for the payment of such improvements. Any number of


roads, streets, avenues, lanes, alleys, or other public places, or

Req. No. 2334 Page 107


parts thereof of such, to be improved may be included in one


resolution. After any road, street, avenue, lane, alley, or other


public place, or part thereof of such, has been protested by the


record title holders of more than forty percent (40%) of the land


liable to assessment for such improvement, the board of county


commissioners of said county shall not include the same in


proceedings pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1230 through 1262


of this title for a period of six (6) months except upon petitions


as provided by Section 1236 of this title.


C. If sufficient protests are filed as to any one or more of


such roads, streets, avenues, lanes, alleys, or other public places,


or parts thereof of such, the same shall be eliminated from said


such proceedings, but the other roads, streets, avenues, lanes,


alleys, or other public places, or parts thereof of such, as to


which sufficient protests have not been filed shall not be affected


thereby. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any


development pursuant to the provisions of Section 1236 of this


title.


D. Any person, firm, corporation, administrator, or guardian


holding the title to said such lands liable to assessment may enter


a protest or objection.


E. The finding of the board as to the sufficiency or


insufficiency of the protest shall be conclusive and binding for all


purposes and against all persons. The board shall have the power to

Req. No. 2334 Page 108


have hearings on said such protest and compel the attendance of


witnesses under oath to determine the sufficiency of said such


protest. No action or suit to question the findings of the board on


the sufficiency of said such protests shall be commenced later than


fifteen (15) days after such finding. Not less than ten (10) days


before the hearing the county clerk shall notify each record title


holder of lots or tracts of land within said the district as shown


by the current ownership rolls prepared and certified by the county


clerk within sixty (60) days last preceding the date of the


notification in the following manner:


1. By mailing a postal card directly to said the record title


holder at his or her last-known address as shown by the ownership


roll, notifying said such record title holder of the initiation of


proceedings and advising him or her that his their property will be


liable to assessment and referring him or her to the issues of the


newspaper or website in which the resolution is or will be


published. If titles to several tracts appear to be held by the


same person, all may be included in the same notification; or


2. In lieu of the mailing of a postal card, the county clerk


may mail to each record title holder a copy of the newspaper


publication or resolution.


Proof of the notification given shall be made by certificate of the


clerk which shall be filed in his or her office. Failure of any one


of said the record title holders to receive said the notification

Req. No. 2334 Page 109


shall not invalidate any of the proceedings made pursuant to the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 49. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1242, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1242. When the report required pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1241 of this title has been returned, the


board of county commissioners shall appoint a time for holding a


hearing to hear any complaints or objections that may be made


concerning the appraisement and apportionment as to any of such lots


or tracts of land. Notice of such hearing shall be published by the


county clerk in six consecutive issues of a daily newspaper or, for


two consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper of general circulation


published in said the county, or for two (2) consecutive weeks on an


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county.


The time fixed for said such hearing shall be not less than five (5)


nor more than ten (10) days from the last publication. Not less


than ten (10) days before said such hearing the clerk shall notify


each listed record title holder of lots or tracts of land within


said the district as shown by the current ownership rolls in the


county treasurer’s office in the manner provided pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1234 of this title.


SECTION 50. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1250, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 2334 Page 110


Section 1250. The assessments provided for and levied pursuant


to the provisions of Sections 1230 through 1262 of this title shall


be payable as the installments become due, together with the


interest on said such installments, to the county clerk who shall


give proper receipts for such payments and credit the same upon the


road assessment record. It shall be the duty of the county clerk to


keep an accurate account of all such collections made by the clerk


and to pay to the county treasurer daily the amounts of such


assessments collected by the clerk. The amounts so collected and


paid to the county treasurer shall constitute a separate, special


fund to be used and applied to the payment of such bonds and the


interest thereon, as provided by Sections 1257 through 1260 of this


title. It shall be the duty of the county clerk, not less than


thirty (30) days and not more than forty (40) days before the


maturity of any installment of such assessments, to publish in two


successive issues of a daily newspaper or in one issue of a weekly


newspaper, published in the county and of general circulation in


said the county, or on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county, a notice advising the record title holder


of the land affected by such assessment of the date when such


installment and interest will be due, and designating the road,


street, streets, or public places, or parts thereof of such, for the


improvement of which such assessments have been levied, and that


unless such assessments shall be promptly paid, said such

Req. No. 2334 Page 111


installment and interest shall bear interest at the rate of fifteen


percent (15%) per annum until paid, and proceedings taken according


to law to collect said such installment and interest. It shall also


be the duty of the county clerk, not less than thirty (30) days


before the maturity of any installment of such assessments, to send


a notice by mail advising the record titleholder of the land


affected by such assessment of the date when such installment and


interest will be due, and designating the road, street, streets, or


public places, or parts thereof of such, for the improvement of


which such assessments have been levied, and that unless such


assessments shall be promptly paid, said such installment and


interest shall bear interest at the rate of fifteen percent (15%)


per annum until paid, and proceedings taken according to law to


collect said such installment and interest. Failure of the owner to


receive any notice shall not invalidate any of the proceedings


authorized in this title and shall not invalidate any installment or


interest that may be due. It shall be the duty of the county clerk,


promptly after the date of maturity of any such installment and


interest and on or before the fifteenth day of September in each


year, to certify such installment and interest due to the county


treasurer of the county in which the improvement district is


located, which installment and interest shall be placed by said the


county treasurer upon the November delinquent tax list of the same


year prepared by the treasurer of said county such and collected as

Req. No. 2334 Page 112


other delinquent taxes are collected. It shall be the duty of the


county treasurer to collect such installments of assessment,


together with interest and penalty, so certified to the treasurer by


the county clerk, as provided for in this section, but any taxpayer


shall have the right to pay his or her ad valorem taxes to the


county treasurer regardless of the delinquency of such assessments.


Within thirty (30) days from the receipt of such delinquent


assessments, interest and penalty collected by the county treasurer


shall be disbursed in accordance with the provisions of Sections


1230 through 1262 of this title. Failure of the county clerk to


publish notice of the maturing of any installment and interest shall


in no way affect the validity of the proceedings to collect such


installment and interest pursuant to the provisions of this section.


All payments to the county treasurer on account of such assessments


shall be certified by the treasurer to the county clerk to be


credited on the road assessment record.


SECTION 51. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1264, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1264. Upon the filing of a petition with the board of


county commissioners for a change in boundaries of any road


improvement district, signed by a majority of the assessed members


of the existing road improvement district, the board of county


commissioners shall cause notice to be published one time in a


newspaper printed and published in the county and of general

Req. No. 2334 Page 113


circulation in the area sought to be annexed, or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county, at least


ten (10) days before the time at which such petition will be heard.


Such notice shall state the time and place when and where the


petition will be heard by the board of county commissioners, a brief


substance of the petition and that all persons interested may appear


and be heard. The board of county commissioners shall have


exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine all contests and


objections pertaining to such annexation. At such hearing the board


of county commissioners shall also determine whether or not the


annexation of such area to such road improvement district will be to


the best interests of the residents of the area affected, or


beneficial to the public health and welfare of said such area as now


exists, or to be developed, and if said such board of county


commissioners determines that it will, then the board of county


commissioners shall make an order annexing such area to said such


road improvement district, and such territory for all purposes shall


thereafter be a part of the road improvement district. The annexed


territory shall assume its proportion of all legal indebtedness


outstanding against the original road improvement district,


including bonded indebtedness.


SECTION 52. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1276, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 2334 Page 114


Section 1276. A. Upon the adoption of a resolution by a


majority of the board of county commissioners or upon a petition to


the board of county commissioners signed by twenty percent (20%) of


the qualified voters of the county as determined by the last general


election, the board of county commissioners shall by resolution call


an election for the purpose of issuing bonds as provided in Section


1275 of this act title.


B. The board of county commissioners shall give notice of said


such election by publication once a week weekly for two (2)


consecutive weeks in a daily or weekly newspaper of general


circulation published in the county, or on an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county. If there is no


daily or weekly newspaper published in such county, then notice


shall be given by publication in the manner provided for in this


section in a newspaper of general circulation in such county.


C. The resolution calling for the election and the notice shall


contain:


1. The amount of bonds to be issued;


2. The time of holding said such election, which shall not be


less than thirty (30) days from the first publication of any notice;


and


3. The purpose for which the facilities or reservoirs are to be


used.



Req. No. 2334 Page 115


D. Printed ballots stating “For Bonds” and “Against Bonds”


shall be cast at the election.


SECTION 53. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1412, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1412. The county budget board shall hold a public


hearing on the proposed budget no later than fifteen (15) days prior


to the beginning of the budget year. Notice of the date, time, and


place of the hearing, together with the proposed budget summaries,


shall be published on the county’s website and in a newspaper of


general circulation in the county or an Internet website for


official publications maintained by the county, not less than five


(5) days before the date of the hearing. Affidavit and proof of


publication shall be attached to the budget when filed with the


county excise board and State Auditor and Inspector. The county


clerk shall make available a sufficient number of copies of the


proposed budgets as the county budget board shall determine and have


them available for review or for distribution or sale at the office


of the county clerk. At the public hearing on the budgets, any


person may present to the county budget board comments,


recommendations, or information on any part of the proposed budget.


SECTION 54. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1505, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 85, O.S.L. 2025 (19 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1505), is amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 2334 Page 116


Section 1505. The following procedures shall be used by


counties for the requisition, purchase, lease-purchase, rental, and


receipt of supplies, materials, road and bridge construction


services, equipment, and other services, except for professional


services as defined in Section 803 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, for the maintenance, operation, and capital expenditures


of county government unless otherwise provided for by law.


A. The procedure for requisitioning items for county offices


shall be as follows:


1. The requesting department shall prepare a requisition form


in triplicate. The requisition shall contain any specifications for


an item as deemed necessary by the requesting department. The form


shall be prescribed by the State Auditor and Inspector;


2. The requesting department shall retain a copy of the


requisition and forward the original requisition and a copy to the


county purchasing agent; and


3. Upon receipt of the requisition, the county purchasing


agent, within two (2) working days, shall begin the bidding and


purchasing process as provided for in this section. Nothing in this


section shall prohibit the transfer of supplies, materials, or


equipment between county departments upon a written agreement


between county officers.





Req. No. 2334 Page 117


B. The bid procedure for selecting a vendor for the purchase,


lease-purchase, or rental of supplies, materials, equipment, and


services used by a county shall be as follows:


1. The county purchasing agent shall request written


recommendations from all county officers pertaining to needed or


commonly used supplies, materials, road and bridge construction


services, equipment, and services. From such recommendations and


available requisition, purchase, or inventory records, the county


purchasing agent shall prepare a list of items needed or commonly


used by county officers. The county purchasing agent shall request


from the Purchasing Division or from the Information Services


Division in the case of information technology and telecommunication


goods and services of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services all contracts quoting the price the state is paying for the


items. The county purchasing agent shall either request the


Purchasing Division or the Information Services Division of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services, as applicable, to make


the purchase for the county or the county purchasing agent shall


solicit bids for unit prices on the items for periods of not to


exceed twelve (12) months in the manner described in paragraph 2 of


this subsection. If the county purchasing agent receives a


requisition for an item for which the county purchasing agent does


not have a current bid, the county purchasing agent shall request


from the Purchasing Division or the Information Services Division of

Req. No. 2334 Page 118


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, as applicable, all


contracts quoting the price the state is paying for the item. The


county purchasing agent shall either request the Purchasing Division


or the Information Services Division of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services, as applicable, to make the purchase for the


county or the county purchasing agent shall solicit bids in the


manner described in paragraph 2 of this subsection. Nothing in this


paragraph shall prohibit bids from being taken on an item currently


on a twelve-month bid list, at any time deemed necessary by the


county purchasing agent. Whenever the county purchasing agent deems


it necessary to take a bid on an item currently on a twelve-month


bid list, the reason for the bid shall be entered into the minutes


of the board of county commissioners;


2. Bids shall be solicited by mailing or emailing a notice to


all persons or firms who have made a written request of the county


purchasing agent that they be notified of such bid solicitation and


to all other persons or firms who might reasonably be expected to


submit bids. Notice of solicitation of bids shall also be published


one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or on


an Internet website for official publications maintained by the


county. Notices shall be mailed and published at least ten (10)


days prior to the date on which the bids are opened. Proof of the


mailing or emailing shall be made by the affidavit of the person


mailing or emailing the request for bids and shall be made a part of

Req. No. 2334 Page 119


the official records of the county purchasing agent. The notice


shall specify whether the county will consider written bids,


electronic bids, or both; the decision to exclusively consider


either written bids or electronic bids shall be determined pursuant


to an affirmative vote of the board of county commissioners.


Whenever any prospective supplier or vendor dealing in or listing


for sale any particular item or article required to be purchased or


acquired by sealed bids fails to enter or offer a sealed bid for


three successive bid solicitations, the name of the supplier or


vendor may be dropped from the mailing lists of the board of county


commissioners;


3. The sealed bids received from vendors and the state contract


price received from the applicable division of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services shall be given to the county


clerk by the county purchasing agent. The county clerk shall


forward the sealed bids and state contract price, if any, to the


board of county commissioners;


4. The board of county commissioners, in an open meeting, shall


open the sealed bids and compare them to the state contract price.


The board of county commissioners shall select the lowest and best


bid based upon, if applicable, the availability of material and


transportation cost to the job site within thirty (30) days of the


meeting. For any special item not included on the list of needed or


commonly used items, the requisitioning official shall review the

Req. No. 2334 Page 120


bids and submit a written recommendation to the board before final


approval. The board of county commissioners shall keep a written


record of the meeting as required by law, and any time the lowest


bid was not considered to be the lowest and best bid, the reason for


such conclusion shall be recorded. Whenever the board of county


commissioners rejects the written recommendation of the


requisitioning official pertaining to a special item, the reasons


for the rejection shall be entered in their minutes and stated in a


letter to the requisitioning official and county purchasing agent;


5. The county purchasing agent shall notify the successful


bidders and shall maintain a copy of the notification. The county


purchasing agent shall prepare and maintain a vendors list


specifying the successful bidders and shall notify each county


officer of the list. The county purchasing agent may remove any


vendor from such list who refuses to provide goods or services as


provided by contract if the removal is authorized by the board of


county commissioners. The county purchasing agent may make


purchases from the remaining bidders for a price at or below the bid


price; and


6. When bids have been solicited as provided for by law and no


bids have been received, the procedure shall be as follows:


a. the county purchasing agent shall determine if


potential vendors are willing to commit to a firm


price for a reduced period of time, and, if such is

Req. No. 2334 Page 121


the case, the bid procedure described in this


subsection shall be followed,


b. if vendors are not willing to commit to a firm price


for a reduced period, the purchasing agent shall


solicit and record at least three quotes of current


prices available to the county and authorize the


purchase of goods or services based on the lowest and


best quote as it becomes necessary to acquire such


goods or services. The quotes shall be recorded on a


form prescribed by the State Auditor and Inspector and


shall be attached to the purchase order and filed with


the county clerk’s copy of the purchase order. Any


time the lowest quote was not considered to be the


lowest and best quote, the reason for this conclusion


shall be recorded by the county purchasing agent and


transmitted to the county clerk, or


c. if three quotes are not available, a memorandum to the


county clerk from the county purchasing agent shall


describe the basis upon which a purchase is


authorized. The memorandum shall state the reasons


why the price for such a purchase is the lowest and


best under the circumstances. The county clerk shall


then attach the memorandum to the county clerk’s copy



Req. No. 2334 Page 122


of the purchase order and file both in the office of


the county clerk.


C. After selection of a vendor, the procedure for the purchase,


lease-purchase, or rental of supplies, materials, road and bridge


construction services, equipment, and services used by a county


shall be as follows:


1. The county purchasing agent shall prepare a purchase order


in quadruplicate and submit it with a copy of the requisition to the


county clerk;


2. The county clerk shall then encumber the amount stated on


the purchase order and assign a sequential number to the purchase


order;


3. If there is an unencumbered balance in the appropriation


made for that purpose by the county excise board, the county clerk


shall so certify in the following form:


“I hereby certify that the amount of this encumbrance has been


entered against the designated appropriation accounts and that this


encumbrance is within the authorized available balance of the


appropriation.


Dated this ________ day of ________, 20__.


________________________________


County Clerk/Deputy


of _____________________ County”.



Req. No. 2334 Page 123


In instances where it is impossible to ascertain the exact amount of


the indebtedness sought to be incurred at the time of recording the


encumbrance, an estimated amount may be used. No purchase order


shall be valid unless signed by the county purchasing agent and


certified by the county clerk; and


4. The county clerk shall file the original purchase order and


return three copies to the county purchasing agent who shall file a


copy, retain a copy for the county road and bridge inventory officer


if the purchase order is for the purchase of equipment, supplies, or


materials for the construction or maintenance of roads and bridges,


and submit the other copy to the receiving officer of the requesting


department.


D. 1. The procedure for the purchase of supplies, materials,


equipment, and services at public auction or by sealed bid to be


used by a county shall be as follows:


a. the county purchasing agent shall prepare a purchase


order in quadruplicate and submit it with a copy of


the requisition to the county clerk,


b. the county clerk shall then encumber the amount stated


on the purchase order and assign a sequential number


to the purchase order,


c. if there is an unencumbered balance in the


appropriation made for that purpose by the county



Req. No. 2334 Page 124


excise board, the county clerk shall so certify in the


following form:


“I hereby certify that the amount of this encumbrance


has been entered against the designated appropriation


accounts and that this encumbrance is within the


authorized available balance of the appropriation.


Dated this ________ day of ________, 20__.


________________________________


County Clerk/Deputy


of _____________________ County”.


In instances where it is impossible to ascertain the


exact amount of the indebtedness sought to be incurred


at the time of recording the encumbrance, an estimated


amount may be used. No purchase order shall be valid


unless signed by the county purchasing agent and


certified by the county clerk, and


d. the county clerk shall file the original purchase


order and return three copies to the county purchasing


agent who shall file a copy, retain a copy for the


county road and bridge inventory officer if the


purchase order is for the purchase of equipment,


supplies, or materials for the construction or


maintenance of roads and bridges, and submit the other



Req. No. 2334 Page 125


copy to the receiving officer of the requesting


department.


2. The procedure for the purchase of supplies, materials, and


equipment at a public auction when the purchase will be made with


the proceeds from the sale of county property at the same public


auction is as follows:


a. the purchasing agent shall cause such items being sold


to be appraised in the manner determined in Section


421.1 of this title,


b. the county purchasing agent shall prepare a purchase


order in quadruplicate and submit it with a copy of


the requisition to the county clerk,


c. the county clerk shall then encumber the amount of the


appraised value and any additional funds obligated by


the county on the purchase order and assign a


sequential number to the purchase order,


d. the county clerk shall certify that the amount of the


encumbrance is equal to the appraised value of the


item being sold plus any additional funds obligated by


the county. In effect, the recording of the


encumbrance is an estimate that is authorized by law.


No purchase order shall be valid unless signed by the


county purchasing agent and certified by the county


clerk,

Req. No. 2334 Page 126


e. the county clerk shall file the original purchase


order and return three copies to the county purchasing


agent who shall file a copy, retain a copy for the


county road and bridge inventory officer if the


purchase order is for the purchase of equipment,


supplies, or materials for the construction or


maintenance of roads and bridges, and submit the other


copy to the receiving officer of the requesting


department, and


f. a purchase shall not be bid until such time that the


appraised item or items are sold. Any item or items


purchased shall not exceed the appraised value plus


any additional funds obligated by the county or the


actual selling price of the item or items, whichever


is the lesser amount.


E. The procedure for the receipt of items shall be as follows:


1. A receiving officer for the requesting department shall be


responsible for receiving all items delivered to that department;


2. Upon the delivery of an item, the receiving officer shall


determine if a purchase order exists for the item being delivered;


3. If no such purchase order has been provided, the receiving


officer shall refuse delivery of the item;


4. If a purchase order is on file, the receiving officer shall


obtain a delivery ticket, bill of lading, or other delivery document

Req. No. 2334 Page 127


and compare it with the purchase order. If any item is back-


ordered, the back order and estimated date of delivery shall be


noted in the receiving report;


5. The receiving officer shall complete a receiving report in


quadruplicate which shall state the quantity and quality of goods


delivered. The receiving report form shall be prescribed by the


State Auditor and Inspector. The person delivering the goods shall


acknowledge the delivery by signature, noting the date and time;


6. The receiving officer shall file the original receiving


report and submit:


a. a copy of the purchase order and a copy of the


receiving report to the county purchasing agent, and


b. a copy of the receiving report with the delivery


documentation to the county clerk;


7. The county purchasing agent shall file a copy of the


purchase order and a copy of the receiving report;


8. Upon receipt of the original receiving report and the


delivery documentation, the county clerk shall maintain a file until


such time as an invoice is received from the vendor;


9. The invoice shall state the name and address of the vendor


and must be sufficiently itemized to clearly describe each item


purchased, the unit price when applicable, the number or volume of


each item purchased, the total price, the total purchase price, and


the date of the purchase;

Req. No. 2334 Page 128


10. Upon receipt of an invoice, the county clerk shall compare


the following documents:


a. requisition,


b. purchase order,


c. invoice with noncollusion affidavit as required by


law,


d. receiving report, and


e. delivery document.


The documents shall be available for public inspection during


regular business hours; and


11. If the documents conform as to the quantity and quality of


the items, the county clerk shall prepare a warrant for payment


according to procedures provided for by law.


F. The following procedures are for the processing of purchase


orders:


1. The purchasing agent shall be allowed up to three (3) days


to process purchase orders to be presented to the board of county


commissioners for consideration and payment. Nothing herein shall


prevent the purchasing agent from processing or the board of county


commissioners from consideration and payment of utilities, travel


claims, and payroll claims;


2. The board of county commissioners shall consider the


purchase orders so presented and act upon the purchase orders, by


allowing in full or in part or by holding for further information or

Req. No. 2334 Page 129


disallowing the same. The disposition of purchase orders shall be


indicated by the board of county commissioners, showing the amounts


allowed or disallowed, and shall be signed by at least two members


of the board of county commissioners. Any claim held over for


further information shall be acted upon by allowing or disallowing


same at any future meeting of the board held within seventy-five


(75) days from the date of filing of the purchase order. Any


purchase order not acted upon within the seventy-five (75) days from


the date of filing shall be deemed to have been disallowed, but such


disallowance shall not prevent the refiling of the purchase order at


the proper time; and


3. Whenever any allowance, either in whole or in part, is made


upon any purchase order presented to the board of county


commissioners and is accepted by the person making the claim, such


allowance shall be a full settlement of the entire purchase order


and provided that the cashing of warrant shall be considered as


acceptance by the claimant.


G. The procedure upon consumption or disposal of supplies,


materials, or equipment shall be as follows:


1. For consumable road or bridge items or materials, a


quarterly report of the road and bridge projects completed during


such period shall be prepared and kept on file by the consuming


department. The quarterly report may be prepared and kept


electronically by the consuming department. The report shall

Req. No. 2334 Page 130


contain a record of the date, the place, and the purpose for the use


of the road or bridge items or materials. For purposes of


identifying county bridges, the board of county commissioners shall


number each bridge subject to its jurisdiction; and


2. For disposal of all equipment and information technology and


telecommunication goods which originally cost more than Five Hundred


Dollars ($500.00), resolution of disposal shall be submitted by the


officer on a form prescribed by the Office of the State Auditor and


Inspector to the board of county commissioners. The approval of the


resolution of disposal shall be entered into the minutes of the


board.


H. Inventory forms and reports shall be retained for not less


than two (2) years after all audit requirements for the state and


federal government have been fulfilled and after any pending


litigation involving the forms and reports has been resolved.


I. The procedures provided for in this section shall not apply


when a county officer certifies that an emergency exists requiring


an immediate expenditure of funds. Such an expenditure of funds


shall not exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). The county


officer shall give the county purchasing agent a written explanation


of the emergency. The county purchasing agent shall attach the


written explanation to the purchase order. The purchases shall be


paid by attaching a properly itemized invoice, as described in this


section, to a purchase order which has been prepared by the county

Req. No. 2334 Page 131


purchasing agent and submitting them to the county clerk for filing,


encumbering, and consideration for payment by the board of county


commissioners.


J. The county purchasing agent may authorize county purchasing


officers to make acquisitions through the state purchase card


program as authorized by the State Purchasing Director in accordance


with Section 85.5 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and defined


in Section 85.2 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. A purchase


cardholder shall sign a purchase card agreement prior to becoming a


cardholder and attend purchase card procedure training as required


by the State Purchasing Director. Complete descriptions of


purchases made by county government entities shall be published as


warrants required to be published pursuant to Sections 444 and 445


of this title.


K. Nothing in this section shall prohibit counties from


providing material and/or or services bids on the twelve-month bid


list to all road and bridge projects and contracts. All non-road


and bridge related construction contracts shall refer to subsection


A of Section 103 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 55. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 1714, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1714. The board shall hold a public hearing on the


proposed budget no later than fifteen (15) days prior to the


beginning of the budget year. Notice of the date, time, and place

Req. No. 2334 Page 132


of the hearing, together with the proposed budget summaries, shall


be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district


or on an Internet website for official publications maintained by


the county where the district is located not less than five (5) days


before the date of the hearing. Affidavit and proof of publication


shall be attached to the budget when filed with the county excise


board and State Auditor and Inspector. The district shall make


available a sufficient number of copies of the proposed budgets as


the board shall determine and have them available for review or for


distribution or sale at the office of the district. At the public


hearing on the budgets, any person may present to the board


comments, recommendations, or information on any part of the


proposed budget.


SECTION 56. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 13A-109, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 13A-109. A. The board of education of every school


district and technology center school district shall notify, by


resolution, the secretary of the county election board responsible


for certifying its election of any regular or special election.


B. The resolution calling for an election or elections shall


include, but shall not be limited to, the following information:


1. Date or dates of the election or elections;





Req. No. 2334 Page 133


2. Identification of the office or offices to be filled,


qualifications of candidates for office and the length of term of


each;


3. Information describing election districts within the school


district, if applicable;


4. Ballot titles of the question or questions to be voted upon;


5. Information describing the persons eligible to vote in the


election; and


6. All other information necessary for conducting the election


or elections.


C. Resolutions calling for regular elections shall be delivered


to the secretary of the county election board no fewer than fifteen


(15) days preceding the first day of the filing period established


in Section 13A-105 of this title. The resolution shall contain all


questions to be voted upon at the election to be held on the day as


required in Section 13A-103 of this title.


D. Resolutions calling for special elections shall be delivered


to the secretary of the county election board no fewer than sixty


(60) days preceding the election. A special filing period, if


necessary, shall be scheduled for three days and shall begin not


more than twenty (20) days following the date the resolution is


required to be submitted to the county election board.





Req. No. 2334 Page 134


E. In addition to notifying the secretary of the county


election board of the election by resolution as required in this


section:


1. For elections of members of the board of education of a


school district, the board shall also publish a legal notice for


each regular and special election in one issue of a legal newspaper


of the county, as defined by Section 106 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, in the county wherein the school district administrative


office is located or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county wherein the school district


administrative office is located at least ten (10) days prior to the


filing period and shall issue a news release of the upcoming filing


period and election to through publication in a newspaper of general


circulation in the county wherein the school district administrative


office is located or by posting on an Internet website for official


publications or social media account maintained by the school


district. The legal notice and press news release shall include,


but shall not be limited to, the dates of the filing period for the


election or elections and the office or offices to be filled. The


notice shall also be posted at the school district administrative


offices and county election board offices; and


2. For elections of members of the board of education of a


technology center school district, the board shall also publish a


legal notice for each regular and special election in one issue of a

Req. No. 2334 Page 135


legal newspaper of the county, as defined by Section 106 of Title 25


of the Oklahoma Statutes, in each county wherein the school district


is a member in the technology center district or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by each county wherein


the school district is a member in the technology center district at


least ten (10) days prior to the filing period. Additionally, the


technology center school district shall issue a news release of the


upcoming filing period and election to through publication in a


newspaper of general circulation in each county wherein the school


district is a member in the technology center district or by posting


on an Internet website for official publications or social media


account maintained by the technology center district. The legal


notice and press news release shall include, but shall not be


limited to, the dates of the filing period for the election or


elections and the office or offices to be filled. The notice shall


also be posted in each county at the technology center school


district administrative offices, if such office exists in the


county, and county election board office in each county.


SECTION 57. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2819.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2819.1. A. No county assessor may decrease the


assessment ratio used to compute the taxable value of real or


personal property unless the assessor provides written notice of an


intent to decrease the assessment ratio at least ninety (90) days

Req. No. 2334 Page 136


prior to the first date as of which the assessor intends to cause


such ratio to be decreased. The written notice shall be mailed by


certified mail with return receipt requested to the county


treasurer, the county clerk, the county sheriff, to each of the


county commissioners and to the governing board of any local


government jurisdiction that levies ad valorem taxes upon any


property located within the county. Such notice shall be mailed not


later than sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the ninety-day


period prescribed by this subsection. The notice shall clearly


state the assessment ratio in effect prior to the decrease, the


category of property (whether real or personal or both) to be


affected by the proposed decrease in assessment ratio and the date


as of which such decrease is proposed to take effect.


B. The county assessor shall also be required to publish a


notice of intent to decrease the assessment ratio which clearly


states the ratio in effect prior to the decrease, the category of


property (whether real or personal or both) to be affected by the


proposed decrease in assessment ratio and the date as of which such


decrease is proposed to take effect. The notice shall be placed


published at least one time for three (3) consecutive weeks in a


newspaper of general circulation in the county in which where the


assessor holds office or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county in which the assessor holds


office. The last publication date shall be not later than thirty

Req. No. 2334 Page 137


(30) days prior to the date that any decrease in the assessment


ratio is implemented. At the beginning of the notice to be


published, there shall appear in a font which is conspicuously


larger than the other information which appears in the notice the


following wording: “NOTICE OF INTENT TO DECREASE ASSESSMENT RATIO


WITH RESPECT TO REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY OR BOTH IN [insert


applicable county name] FOR THE [insert applicable year] ASSESSMENT


YEAR”.


C. Before the county assessor may implement a decrease in an


assessment ratio with respect to either real or personal property,


there shall be at least three public meetings held at a location


within the county prior to the date as of which the first decrease


in assessment ratio occurs. Notice of the meetings shall be posted


in the office of the county assessor, the office of the county


treasurer, the office of each county commissioner, the office of the


county clerk and such other places within the county as may be


feasible in order to provide adequate notice of the date, time, and


location of each meeting. The last public meeting shall be held not


later than thirty (30) days prior to the date any decrease in the


applicable assessment ratio is implemented.


D. The county assessor or a designee from the office of the


county assessor shall attend each of the public meetings in order to


answer questions about the proposed decrease in the assessment ratio



Req. No. 2334 Page 138


and any possible effects on the budgets of any ad valorem taxing


jurisdiction.


SECTION 58. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2836, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2836. A. The county assessor of each county in the


state shall, on the first day of January of each year, or as soon


thereafter as may be practicable, proceed to take a list of taxable


property in the county. In order to take lists of personal property


and receive homestead exemption applications, the county assessor,


or the assessor’s deputy, shall meet the taxpayers at various places


throughout the county. The county assessor may exercise discretion


as to where to meet the taxpayers and how long to stay at each


place, provided the assessor goes to each city and incorporated town


in counties that have not abolished household personal property tax.


At least ten (10) days prior to the date the county assessor will


meet the taxpayers to list their property, the county assessor shall


give notice by publication in at least one newspaper of general


circulation in the county or on an Internet website for official


publications maintained by the county, stating the date and hours of


the day of each visit to each city, town or other place; and such.


Such notice may be published in newspapers the manner of commercial


advertising, rather than legal notices, and the county may pay up to


rates prevalent in the area for commercial advertising.



Req. No. 2334 Page 139


B. If any taxpayer shall fail to meet the county assessor and


list the taxpayer’s property on the date advertised, such taxpayer


may render a written list of all the taxpayer’s personal property


and make written application for homestead exemption, and shall


subscribe and swear to the oath required by each taxpayer as to its


correctness. Such written lists or applications shall not


constitute a valid return or application unless made on the forms


prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission and in the manner required


by law.


C. After the county assessor shall have visited each city,


town, or other place, the county assessor shall be in the county


assessor’s office at the county seat from March 1 to March 15,


inclusive, for the purpose of receiving lists from those who have


not listed their property for the current year, and all who fail to


list all or any part of their personal property for the current


year, on or before March 15, shall be delinquent. If any personal


property is not listed by the person whose duty it is to list such


property on or before March 15 of any year, when such property is


assessed there shall be added to the assessed valuation of such


property as a mandatory penalty, amounts as follows:


1. If listed or assessed after March 15, but on or before April


15, ten percent (10%) of the assessed value; and


2. If listed or assessed after April 15, twenty percent (20%)


of the assessed value.

Req. No. 2334 Page 140


D. If the county assessor fails, neglects, or refuses to add


the valuation penalty as provided by this section, the county


assessor shall be liable on the county assessor’s official bond for


the amount of the penalties.


SECTION 59. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2882, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2882. A. In any case where the State Board of


Equalization, in the equalization of property locally assessed,


shall make its determination that the ratio of the assessed value of


real property within the county to the fair cash value of said such


real property does not comply with the legal requirements for the


level of assessment, or does not comply with the legal requirements


for the uniformity of assessment then the State Board shall notify,


by mail, the board of county commissioners of said such county, and


the county assessor, giving the ratio determined and the percentage


valuation increase or decrease the county must achieve during the


next assessment period or the action required for compliance with


any applicable order for assessment uniformity.


B. The district attorney, acting under direction of the board


of county commissioners and for the entire taxpaying public of the


county shall have twenty (20) days from date of such notice to the


board of county commissioners and the county assessor in which to


file with the Clerk of the Court of Tax Review a written complaint


specifying grievances and the pertinent facts in relation thereto in

Req. No. 2334 Page 141


ordinary and concise language and without repetition, and in such


manner as to enable a person of common understanding to know what is


intended. The board of county commissioners shall cause a notice of


the order for a valuation increase or decrease made by the State


Board of Equalization to be published in at least one (1) newspaper


of general circulation within the county or on an Internet website


for official publications maintained by the county at least one (1)


time each week for two (2) consecutive weeks. Such notice by


publication shall constitute sufficient notice to any taxpayer


within such county of the possible increase or decrease in the


valuation of property owned by the taxpayer located within such


county. No individual valuation increase or decrease notice shall


be required to be mailed or delivered to an affected taxpayer as a


result of the implementation of an order for an increase or decrease


in valuation issued by the State Board of Equalization.


C. After the filing of a complaint as provided for in


subsection B of this section the State Board of Equalization shall


have fifteen (15) days within which to file an answer. The Court of


Tax Review shall set a date of hearing within sixty (60) days of the


date of the notice which caused the filing of the complaint. The


Court of Tax Review shall be authorized and empowered to take


evidence pertinent to said such complaint, and for that purpose, is


authorized to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production


of books, records, and papers by subpoena, and to confirm, correct

Req. No. 2334 Page 142


or adjust the order of the State Board of Equalization, as required


by law.


D. At the time of hearing upon a complaint filed pursuant to


this section, the State Board of Equalization shall bear the burden


of proof of supporting its action which is the subject matter of the


complaint.


E. Either the State Board of Equalization or the party filing a


complaint pursuant to this section may appeal the decision of the


Court of Tax Review by filing a notice of intent to appeal with the


Clerk of the Court of Tax Review within ten (10) calendar days of


the date the final decision is rendered. Appeal shall be made to


the Oklahoma Supreme Court which shall affirm the decision of the


Court of Tax Review if supported by competent evidence.


SECTION 60. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3002, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3002. A. Notwithstanding the provisions of the School


District Budget Act, each board of county commissioners and the


board of education of each school district, shall, prior to October


of each year, make, in writing, a financial statement, showing the


true fiscal condition of their respective political subdivisions as


of the close of the previous fiscal year ended June 30th, and shall


make a written itemized statement of estimated needs and probable


income from all sources including ad valorem tax for the current


fiscal year. Such financial statement shall be supported by

Req. No. 2334 Page 143


schedules or exhibits showing, by classes, the amount of all


receipts and disbursements, and shall be sworn to as being true and


correct. The statement of estimated needs shall be itemized so as


to show, by classes: first, the several amounts necessary for the


current expenses of the political subdivision and each officer and


department thereof as submitted in compliance with the provisions of


Section 3004 of this title; second, the amount required by law to be


provided for sinking fund purposes; third, the probable income that


will be received from all sources, including interest income and ad


valorem taxes; and shall be detailed in form and amount so as to


disclose the several items for which the excise board is authorized


and required, by this article, to approve estimates and make


appropriations.


B. Each municipality that does not prepare an annual audit


pursuant to Section 17-105 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall make a financial statement as required by this section. Every


municipality shall adopt a budget, which shall contain estimates of


expenditures and revenues, including probable income by source, for


the budget year; provided, that all municipalities may use estimated


fund balances if final certified fund balances are not available.


The budget shall be in a format similar to the estimate of needs or,


at the municipality’s discretion, to Sections 17-207 and 17-212


through 17-214 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes. This section



Req. No. 2334 Page 144


shall not apply to any municipality that has opted to prepare a


budget pursuant to the Municipal Budget Act.


C. 1. Each budget and each financial statement and estimate of


needs for each county, city, incorporated town, or school district,


as prepared in accordance with this section, shall be published in


one issue in some legally qualified newspaper published in such


political subdivision. If there be no such newspaper published in


such political subdivision, such statement and estimate shall be so


published in some legally qualified newspaper of general circulation


therein within such subdivision; and such publication shall be made,


in each instance, by the board or authority making the estimate.


2. Each budget and each financial statement and estimate of


needs for each county of this state, as prepared in accordance with


this section, may, instead of the newspaper publication provided for


in paragraph 1 of this subsection, be published on an Internet


website maintained by the county.


D. The financial statements and estimates of all counties shall


be filed with the county excise board on or before August 17 of each


year; and the financial statements and budgets of all incorporated


towns shall be filed with the county excise board on or before


August 22 of each year; and the financial statements and budgets of


all cities shall be filed with the county excise board on or before


August 27 of each year; and the financial statements and estimates


of all school districts shall be filed with the county excise board

Req. No. 2334 Page 145


on or before October 1 of each year. Said Such financial statements


and estimates shall have attached thereto an affidavit showing the


publication thereof as required herein, or they may be filed and the


said affidavit attached thereto at any time within five (5) days


after the filing thereof.


SECTION 61. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3007, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3007. As to each budget, original or supplemental, the


county excise board shall proceed in the following order:


(1) 1. Examine the financial statements contained therein in


such for the purpose of ascertaining the true fiscal condition of


each of the several fund accounts of the municipality as of the


close of the previous fiscal year, or as of the date reported for


supplemental purposes; and it may require such additional statistics


or financial statements from the municipal officers as will enable


it to make such determination, and correct such statements if need


be.;


(2) 2. Examine specifically the several items and amounts


stated in the estimate of needs, and if any be contained therein in


such not authorized by law or that may be contrary to law, or in


excess of needs, as determined by the excise board, said such item


shall be ordered stricken and disregarded. If the amount as to any


lawful item exceeds the amount authorized by law, it shall be



Req. No. 2334 Page 146


ordered reduced to that extent; otherwise, the excise board joins in


responsibility therefor. of such;


(3) 3. Examine the content of the estimate of needs, and if the


governing board has failed to make provision for mandatory


governmental functions, whether such mandate be of the Constitution


or of the Legislature, or if the provision submitted by estimate be


deemed inadequate, the county excise board shall, whether on request


in writing by the officer charged with a mandatory duty or of its


own volition, prepare an estimate by items and amounts, either by


the items submitted or by additional items, and cause publication


thereof of such in some newspaper of general circulation in the


county, or on an Internet website for official publications as


maintained by the county. Such publication in newspapers shall be


in one issue if published in a weekly paper, and in two consecutive


issues if published in a daily paper, and thereafter or once on an


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county.


The excise board shall attach such estimate, together with affidavit


and proof of publication, to that submitted by the governing board,


for further consideration. However, nothing herein contained shall


prevent any governing board, upon a timely finding that its estimate


of needs as first filed is inadequate, from filing a written request


with the excise board to increase such estimate as to any item or


items, whether mandatory or not; whereupon the excise board shall



Req. No. 2334 Page 147


cause publication thereof, as aforesaid, of such at the expense of


the municipality.;


(4) 4. Compute the total means available to each fund, except


the sinking fund, by the converse of the formula provided by law for


computing the tax levy, as provided in Section 3017 of this Code.;


and


(5) 5. If the total of the several items of estimated needs for


lawful purposes as heretofore ascertained is within the income and


revenue lawfully available, the excise board shall approve the same


by items and compute the levy required. If said the total exceeds


the means provided to finance the same, the excise board will


proceed to revise the same by reducing items, in whole or in part,


in the following order: (a) first apply such revision by reduction


of items for governmental functions merely authorized but not


required; (b) if further reduction be necessary, second, by


reduction of items required by the Legislature but not within


Constitutional requirement; (c) if still further reduction be


necessary and no other items remain, third, by reduction of items


for Constitutional governmental functions until the total thereof be


within the income and revenue provided. At the option of the excise


board, the governing board may collaborate in such reductions; but


the final order shall be that of the county excise board.


SECTION 62. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3013, is


amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 2334 Page 148


Section 3013. A. The notice of such the hearing, provided for


in Section 3012 of this title, shall be given by one publication in


a newspaper of general circulation in such the county or on an


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county


and such notice shall fix the time and place of such hearing.


B. The hearing shall be continued from day to day until


concluded, not to exceed a total of ten (10) days; provided,


however, that such hearing shall be concluded before the expiration


of ten (10) days if there are no requests on file with the county


excise board at such hearing. Upon the request of any taxpayer at


such hearing, the excise board shall have the power to call in the


official or person in charge of any office, department, or


municipality for examination concerning estimated needs for current


expense purposes for the current fiscal year, as certified by the


various municipalities.


SECTION 63. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3021, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3021. Whenever the public welfare or the needs of any


county, city, town, or school district shall require, the county


excise board may, on call of the chair, convene at any time for the


purpose of making supplemental or additional appropriations for


current expense purposes; provided, that all such appropriations


authorizing the creation of an indebtedness shall come within the


limitations of Section 26, Article X, Oklahoma Constitution. No

Req. No. 2334 Page 149


supplemental or additional appropriation shall be made for any


county, city, town, or school district in excess of the income and


revenue provided or accumulated for the year. As to all such


proposed appropriations the following procedure shall be followed:


First: 1. The proper officers of the county, city, town, or


school district shall make and file with the excise board a


financial statement showing its true fiscal condition as at the


close of the month next preceding or as of May 15 or June 20, or


both such dates, preceding the date of filing, and shall submit


therewith a statement of the amount and purpose for which each


proposed supplemental appropriation is to be used. The financial


statement shall show, as to current expense or general fund,:


a. the amount of cash in the treasury;,


b. the amount of taxes in process of collection as to


which the date of sale for delinquency has not


elapsed;,


c. the amount of the uncollected portion of the estimated


income other than ad valorem tax as fixed by the


excise board for the current fiscal year;,


d. the amount of warrants outstanding and an estimate of


the interest accrued and accruing thereon; on such,


e. the amount of unexpended balance of all appropriations


for current expense purposes as to which a period of


six (6) months has not elapsed from the date of the

Req. No. 2334 Page 150


close of the fiscal year for which the appropriation


was available;, and


f. the surplus or deficit in revenue, if any, in each


fund.;


Second: 2. If the financial statement herein required shall


correctly reflect a surplus in revenue in any fund available for


current expenses, and the excise board shall so affirmatively find,


it may make supplemental appropriations to an amount not exceeding


the aggregate of such surplus.;


Third: 3. If the surplus of revenue, as found and determined by


the excise board, shall be insufficient for the additional needs and


requirements of the county, or other municipal subdivision, the


excise board shall have the power and authority to revoke and cancel


in whole, or in part, any appropriation or appropriations, or parts


thereof of such, previously made to any officer or department of


government of any county, city, town, or school district and to make


in lieu thereof such supplemental and additional appropriations for


current expense purpose as the interest of the public may require;


provided, that no appropriation or part thereof shall be revoked or


canceled against which there may be an unpaid claim or contract


pending. The total amount of all such appropriations shall not


exceed the aggregate of the amount of appropriations so revoked or


canceled, and the surplus or unappropriated revenue, if any, of the


county, city, town, or school district for which it is proposed to

Req. No. 2334 Page 151


make such additional appropriation; provided, that before any


appropriation or part thereof shall be revoked or canceled, the


officer or officers in charge of the office or department of


government for which any such appropriation is available shall be


notified of the proposed revocation or cancellation, and shall be


afforded an opportunity, if so desired, to appear before the excise


board and protest against such proposed action. As to counties,


cities, and school districts, the financial statement and request


for supplemental appropriations herein required in this section to


be filed with the excise board shall be published at least one time


in some newspaper of general circulation in the county or city for


which made. The financial statement and request for supplemental


appropriations for counties required in this section to be filed


with the excise board may instead be published at least one time on


an Internet website for official publications maintained by the


county. The publication shall be made at least three (3) days prior


to the date on which the excise board shall consider the proposed


supplemental or additional appropriations. No appropriations shall


be made and considered by the excise board in the absence of the


financial statement herein required to be filed.; and


Fourth: 4. If at any time during the budget year it appears to


the county treasurer that there is temporarily insufficient money in


a particular fund to meet the requirements of appropriation in the


fund, the excise board, upon request of the county treasurer and

Req. No. 2334 Page 152


upon notification to the county commissioners, may temporarily


transfer money from one fund to any other fund with the permission


of the county officer in charge of the fund that the money will be


temporarily transferred from. No transfer shall be made from the


debt service fund to any other fund except as may be permitted by


the terms of the bond issue or applicable law. Any funds


temporarily transferred shall be repaid to the original fund from


which they were transferred within the fiscal year that the funds


were transferred.


SECTION 64. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3022, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3022. A. After the officers of the several municipal


subdivisions of the state, constituting the budget making bodies of


such subdivisions, including counties, cities, towns, and school


districts, shall have made and filed their budgets as required by


existing laws with the county clerks, and after advertisement as now


required by law, the excise boards shall meet from time to time


thereafter until the State Board of Equalization shall have reported


the valuation of public service corporations and utilities, together


with the equalized valuation of all other property, to the county,


and shall then proceed to pass on appropriations and make levies for


all such municipal subdivisions as now provided by law, and shall


file a copy of all budgets with the levies made thereon, with the


State Auditor and Inspector, and one copy with the county clerks of

Req. No. 2334 Page 153


the respective counties, and the county clerk shall, immediately


thereafter after receipt of such copy, publish notice for one time,


in some newspaper of general circulation in the county or on the


Internet website for official publications maintained by the county,


that such budgets and levies are on file for the inspection of any


citizen.


B. Within three (3) days after the filing of any such budgets


and levies with the State Auditor and Inspector, the State Auditor


and Inspector shall give notice by mail of the fact and date of such


filing to any taxpayer who shall have filed written request


therefor.


SECTION 65. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3030, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3030. (a) A. The filing of protest, as herein provided


for in this section, shall not prevent the spreading of record and


the collection of any levy made by the excise board, but if any such


protest be filed as herein provided and any taxes shall be paid


pending the hearing and determination of said such protest or


pending the decision of the Supreme Court, all that part of the levy


alleged in said such protest to be illegal shall be retained by the


county treasurer in a separate fund until the legality of said such


levy has been determined, and all taxes paid by any taxpayer in


excess of the amount finally determined to be legal shall be


refunded by the county treasurer to the taxpayer, together with such

Req. No. 2334 Page 154


interest thereon as may have been received by the county treasurer


on such fund pending final determination of the illegality of such


levy, upon verified claim filed with the county clerk at any time


within six (6) months after such final determination.


(b) B. It shall be the duty of the county clerk within thirty


(30) days from the final determination of the illegality of all


levies to notify all taxpayers by publication in one issue of a


newspaper of general circulation in the county or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county that


refund will be made of excess tax collected.


(c) C. If no demand is made for refund within said the six-


month period of six (6) months, said such taxes so collected and


held shall be distributed to the fund or funds for which they were


levied and collected and credited as a surplus therein to such fund


or funds for the next succeeding fiscal year.


SECTION 66. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3102. Except for periods governed by the provisions of


subsection C of Section 3148 of this title, within sixty (60) days


after taxes on personal property shall become delinquent as of April


1, the county treasurer shall mail notice to the last-known address


of such delinquent taxpayer and cause a general notice to be


published one time in some newspaper of general circulation,


published in the county or on an Internet website for official

Req. No. 2334 Page 155


publications maintained by the county, giving the name of each


person owing delinquent personal property taxes, stating the amount


thereof due, and stating that such delinquent personal property


taxes, within thirty (30) days from date of this publication, shall


be placed on a personal property tax lien docket in the office of


the county treasurer and the homestead exemption of such taxpayer


shall be canceled pursuant to Section 2892 of this title. Such


liens are superior to all other liens, conveyances or encumbrances


filed subsequent thereto, on real or personal property. The tax


lien shall be a lien on all real and personal property of the


taxpayer in the county for a period of seven (7) years, except as


otherwise provided in subsection B of Section 3103 of this title.


From and after the entry of the tax upon the tax lien docket, any


person claiming any interest in any land or personal property can


sue the county treasurer and board of county commissioners in the


district court to determine the validity or priority of the lien.


SECTION 67. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3106, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3106. A. Except for periods governed by the provisions


of subsection C of Section 3148 of this title, the county treasurer,


according to the law, shall give notice of delinquent taxes and


special assessments by publication once a week for two (2)


consecutive weeks at any time after April 1, but prior to the end of


September following the year the taxes were first due and payable,

Req. No. 2334 Page 156


in some newspaper in the county to be designated by the county


treasurer or on an Internet website for official publications


maintained by the county. Such notice shall contain a notification


that all lands on which the taxes are delinquent and remain due and


unpaid will be sold in accordance with Section 3105 of this title, a


list of the lands to be sold, the name or names of the last record


owner or owners as of the preceding December 31 or later as


reflected by the records in the office of the county assessor, which


records shall be updated based on real property conveyed after


October 1 each year and the amount of taxes due and delinquent. If


the sale involves property upon which is located a manufactured home


the notice shall contain the following language: “The sale hereby


advertised involves a manufactured home which may be subject to the


right of a secured party to repossess. A holder of a perfected


security interest in such manufactured home may be able to pay ad


valorem taxes based upon the value of the manufactured home apart


from the value of real property.” In addition to said published


such notice, the county treasurer shall give notice by mailing to


the record owner of said such real property as of the preceding


December 31 or later as reflected by the records in the office of


the county assessor, which records shall be updated based on real


property conveyed after October 1 each year, a notice stating the


amount of delinquent taxes owed and informing the owner that the


subject real property will be sold as provided for in Section 3105

Req. No. 2334 Page 157


of this title if the delinquent taxes are not paid and showing the


legal description of the property of the owner being sold. Failure


to receive said such notice shall not invalidate said the sale. The


county treasurer shall charge and collect in cash, cashier’s check


or money order, in addition to the taxes, interest, and penalty, the


publication fees as provided by the provisions of Section 121 of


Title 28 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and Five Dollars ($5.00) plus


postage for mailing the notice, which shall be paid into the county


treasury or whatever fund the publication and mailing fee expenses


came from, and the county shall pay the cost of the publication of


such notice. But in no case shall the county be liable for more


than the amount charged to the delinquent lands for advertising and


the cost of mailing.


B. If personal property taxes become delinquent on a


manufactured home which is located on property not owned by the


owner of the manufactured home and the county treasurer provides


notice pursuant to Sections 3102 and 3103 of this title, such notice


shall also be sent to the last-known address of the owner of the


real property on which the manufactured home is located.


SECTION 68. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3127, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 179, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 3127), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3127. A. The county treasurer, according to the law,


shall give notice of the resale of such real estate by publication

Req. No. 2334 Page 158


of said notice such once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks


preceding such sale, in some newspaper, having been continuously


published one hundred four (104) consecutive weeks with admission to


the United States mails as second-class mail matter, with paid


circulation and published in the county where delivered to the


mails, to be designated by the county treasurer, or on an Internet


website for official publications maintained by the county; and if


there be no paper published or Internet website for official


publications maintained in the county, or publication is refused,


the county treasurer shall give notice by written or printed notice


posted on the door of the courthouse. Such notice shall contain a


description of the real estate to be sold, the name of the record


owner of said such real estate as of the preceding December 3l or


later as shown by the records in the office of the county assessor,


which records shall be updated based on real property conveyed after


October 1 each year, the time and place of sale, the website if


conducted through an online auction, a statement of the date on


which said such real estate taxes first became due and payable as


provided for in Section 2913 of this title, the year or years for


which taxes have been assessed but remain unpaid and a statement


that the same has not been redeemed, the total amount of all


delinquent taxes, costs, penalties and interest accrued, due and


unpaid on the same, and a statement that such real estate will be


sold to the highest bidder for cash. It shall not be necessary to

Req. No. 2334 Page 159


set forth the amount of taxes, penalties, interest, and costs


accrued each year separately, but it shall be sufficient to publish


the total amount of all due and unpaid taxes, penalties, interest,


and costs.


B. 1. The county treasurer shall, at least thirty (30) days


prior to such resale of real estate, give notice by certified mail,


by mailing to the record owner of said such real estate, as shown by


the records in the county assessor’s office, which records shall be


updated based on real property conveyed after October 1 each year,


and to all mortgagees of record of said such real estate a notice


stating the method, the time and, if in person, the place of said


resale and showing the legal description of the real property to be


sold.


2. If the county treasurer does not know and cannot, by the


exercise of reasonable diligence, ascertain the address of any


mortgagee of record, then the county treasurer shall cause an


affidavit to be filed with the county clerk, on a form approved by


the State Auditor and Inspector, stating such fact, which affidavit


shall suffice, along with publication as provided for by this


section, to give any mortgagee of record notice of such resale.


C. 1. Neither failure to send notice to any mortgagee, of


record of said such real estate nor failure to receive notice as


provided for by this section shall invalidate the resale, but the



Req. No. 2334 Page 160


resale tax deed shall be ineffective to extinguish any mortgage on


said such real estate of a mortgagee, to whom no notice was sent.


2. A failure to advertise, an error in the advertisement, or an


error in conducting the sale shall not invalidate a sale at the


proper time and places for taxes of any land on which the taxes were


due and not paid.


Beginning on April 24, 2008, no D. No encumbrancer of real


property in this state shall be permitted to file any instrument


purporting to encumber real property in any county of the state with


any county clerk unless the instrument states on its face the


mailing address of such encumbrancer.


SECTION 69. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3134.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3134.1. A. For the purposes of this section:


1. “Dilapidated building” means a structure which, through


neglect or injury, lacks necessary repairs or otherwise is in a


state of decay or partial ruin to such an extent that such structure


is a hazard to the health, safety, or welfare of the general public;


and


2. “Owner” means the owner of record as shown by the tax rolls


of the county treasurer, at the time property was bid off in the


name of the county.


B. The board of county commissioners of any county in this


state with a population in excess of five hundred fifty thousand

Req. No. 2334 Page 161


(550,000) may cause dilapidated buildings acquired by resale to be


torn down and removed in accordance with the following procedure:


1. For the purposes of this section, “dilapidated building”


means a structure which through neglect or injury lacks necessary


repairs or otherwise is in a state of decay or partial ruin to such


an extent that said structure is a hazard to the health, safety, or


welfare of the general public. “Owner” means the owner of record as


shown by the tax rolls of the county treasurer, at the time property


was bid off in the name of the county;


2. At least ten (10) days’ notice that a building is to be torn


down or removed shall be given before the board of county


commissioners holds a hearing. A copy of the notice shall be posted


on the property to be affected. In addition, a copy of said such


notice shall be sent by mail to the property owner at the address


shown by the tax rolls in the office of the county treasurer.


Written notice shall also be mailed to any mortgage holder as shown


by the records in the office of the county clerk to the last-known


address of the mortgagee. Notice shall also be given by posting a


copy of the notice on the property, and by publication in a


newspaper having a general circulation in the county or on an


Internet website maintained by the county. Such notice shall be


published once not less than ten (10) days prior to any hearing or


action by the board pursuant to the provisions of this section;



Req. No. 2334 Page 162


3. 2. A hearing shall be held by the board of county


commissioners to determine if the property is dilapidated and has


become detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of the general


public and the community, or if said such property creates a fire


hazard which is dangerous to other property;


4. 3. Pursuant to a finding that the condition of the property


constitutes a detriment or a hazard and that the property would be


benefited by the removal of such conditions, the board of county


commissioners may cause the dilapidated building to be torn down and


removed. The board of county commissioners shall fix reasonable


dates for the commencement and completion of the work. The agents


of the county are granted the right of entry on the property for the


performance of the necessary duties as a governmental function of


the county;


5. 4. The board of county commissioners shall determine the


actual cost of the dismantling and removal of dilapidated buildings


and any other expenses that may be necessary in conjunction with the


dismantling and removal of the buildings including the cost of


notice and mailing. If dismantling and removal of the dilapidated


buildings is done on a private contract basis, the contract shall be


awarded to the lowest and best bidder. All costs and expenses may


be paid from the resale property fund of the county; and


6. 5. The board of county commissioners may designate, by


resolution, an administrative officer or administrative body to

Req. No. 2334 Page 163


carry out the duties of the board specified in this section. The


property owner shall have the right of appeal to the board of county


commissioners from any order of the administrative officer or


administrative body. Such appeal shall be taken by filing written


notice of appeal with the county clerk within ten (10) days after


the administrative order is rendered;.


7. C. 1. Nothing in the provisions of this section shall


prevent the county from abating a dilapidated building as a nuisance


or otherwise exercising its duties to protect the health, safety, or


welfare of the general public; and.


8. 2. The officers, employees or agents of the county shall not


be liable for any damages or loss of property due to the removal of


dilapidated buildings performed pursuant to the provisions of this


section or as otherwise prescribed by law.


SECTION 70. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-2334 MSBB 1/13/2026 3:33:39 PM















Req. No. 2334 Page 164